' 









THE 



CONDUCT 



OF T H B 



UNDERSTANDING, 

p 

B Y 

JOHN LOC K & 



D U B L I N: 
Frinttd for W. Wilson, No. 6, Dame-street^ 



MD CC HXXII, 



ADVERTISEMENT. 



THE following valuable Work of Mr. 
LOCKE's being very little known on account 
of it's fcarcity^ it has been thought advife- 
able to -print this cheap E D IT 10 N to pro- 
mote it's circulation. The original copy, 

which was pqfthumous, was left in a very 
incorretl ftate, both as to the punftuation 
and the wording -, but the fear of pervert- 
ing any of this great author's meanings, 
has deterred the EDITOR from attempt-* 
ivg any revifah 



CONTEN T S. 



Introduction, 


Page 


1 


Parts, 




3 


Reafoning,- 


- 


4 


Practice and Habits, 


~ 


12 


Ideas, - 


l 5> 


29 


Principles, 




15 


Mathematics, 


- 


2 3 


Religion, 


-• 


27 


Prejudice, 


- 


31 


IndifFerency, 


- 


3.1 


Examine, 


m 


34 


Obfervation> 


-- 


3* 


Bias, 


- 


40 


Arguments, 


- 


4*- 


Hafte, - - 


43> 


63 


Defultory ■ ■- 




44 


Smattering, 


- 


45 


Univerfality, 


~ 


ib 


Pleading, 


- 


48 


Intermediate Principles, 


- 


5* 


Partiality, - 


52 


>54 


Theology, 




53 


Anticipation, 


- 


66 


Refignation, 


- 


67 


Practice, . - 




68 


Words, 


. 


70 


Wandering, 


- 


72 


DiftincTion, - 


- 


74 


Similies, - 


- 


78 


A/Tent, - 


- 


80 


IndifFerency, 


- 


82 


Ignorance with IndifFerency, 


- 


85 


Quefticn, 


- 


87 


Prefumption, 


- 


88 


Deipondency, 


- 


90 


Analogy, - - 


- 


93 


AlTbciation, 


- 


94- 


Fallacies, 


- 


97 


Fundamental Verities, 


- 


101 


Bottoming, 


- 


103 


Transferring of Thoughts, 


" 


104 






THE 



CONDUCT 



OF THE 



UNDERSTANDING. 



..<..<..< .<..<•< .< < < .< <> >. ►->, > > >• >■•>->- 

SECTION I. 
INTRODUCTION. 

_l H E laft refort a man has rccourfe to in the 
conduct of himfelf, is his underftanding ; for 
though we diftinguifh the faculties of the mind, 
and give the fupreme command to the will, as to 
an agent ; yet the truth is, the man which is the 
agent determines himfelf to this or that volun- 
tary action, upon fome precedent knowledge, or 
appearance of knowledge in the underftanding. 
No man ever fets himfelf about any thing, but 
upon fome view or other which ferves him for a 
reafon for what he does : and whatfoever facul- 
ties he employs, the underftanding with fuch 
light as it has, well or ill informed, conftantly 
B 



a THE CONDUCT OF 

INTRODUCTION. 

leads ; and by that light, true or falfe, all his 
operative powers are directed. The will itfelf, 
how abfolute and uncontroulable foever it may 
be thought, never fails in its obedience to the 
dictates of the underftanding. Temples have 
their facred images, and we fee what influence they 
have always had over a great Dart of mankind. 
But in truth the images in men's minds are the 
snvilible powers that conftantly govern them, and 
to thefe they all univerfally pay a ready fubmif- 
lion. It is therefore of the highefr concernment, 
-that great care fhould be taken of the understand- 
ing, to conduct it right in the fearch of know- 
ledge, and in the judgments it makes. 

The logic now in ufe has fo long poiTeiied the 
chair, as the only art taught in the i'chools for the 
direction of the mind in the ftudy of the arts and 
iciences, that it would perhaps be thought an af- 
fectation of novelty to iufpect, that rules which have 
ferved the learned world thefe two or three thou- 
fand years, and which without any Complaint of 
defects, the learned have refted in, are not fuf- 
ficicnt to guide the understanding. And I fhould 
not doubt but this attempt would be cenfured as 
vanity or prefumption, did not the great 'lord 
Yevuiavts authority juftify it; who not fervilely 
thinking learning could not be advanced beyond 
what it was, becaufc for many ages it had not 
been, did not reft in the lazy approbation and 
applaufe of what was, becaufe it was ; but enlarg- 
ed his mind to what might be. In his preface to 
his Novum Qrganutn concerning logic, he pro- 
nounces thus, ^uifurhrnas dialeBica partes tnbuc- 
ruttt 9 atque hide fidijjima f dentils prafidia comparori 
putarunr, vtrtjpmt ct op time viderunt intelieclum 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 3 

PARTS. 

Bumanum i fill permijfum, ineritb fufpeStum cffe de- 
fore. Verum infirmior ornnino ejl malo metilcbw ; 

nee ipfa ma i expers. Siquidem aidUcTica^ qu£ re- 
eepta efi, licet ad ci villa et aries, qua injernione ei 
opinlone pcfiis funt, reclijfune adhlbeaiur ; natura 
tamen fubtil'itatem lengo intervalh non attingit, et 
pnenfafidoy quod non capil, ad er roves poiius jjtabili- 
endos et quaft fgendes, quam ad viam veritaii ate- 
riendatn valu'it. 

" They," fays he, " who attributed Co much 
to logic, perceived very well and truly, that it 
was not fafe to truft the underfbndlng to itfelf* 
without the guard of any rules. But the remedy 
reached not the evil ; but became a part of it : 
for the logic which, took place, though it might 
do well enough in civil affairs, 2nd the arts which 
confided in talk and opinion, yet comes very far 
ihort of fubtiity in the real performances of na- 
ture, and catching at what it cannot reach, has ; 
ferved to confirm and eftabli th errors, rather 
ihan to open a way to truth. " And therefore a 
little after he fays, •« That it is abfclutely necef- 
fary that a better and per feeler u[c and employ- 
ment of the mind and underfhnding fhould be 
introduced." Necejfariq requiritur ut mei'wr et 
perfeR'ior mentis ci xnttlleftus humani ufus et adeps- 
ratio i itur. 



SECTION II. 
P A R T S. 

There is, it is vifible, great variety in menu's 
understandings, and their natural conftitutions 
rut fo wide a difference between ibme men in 
B 2 



4 THECONDUCTOF 

REASONING. 

refpecc, that art and induftry would never be able 
to matter *, and their very natures feem to want 
a foundation to raife on it that which other men 
eafily attain unto. Amongft men of equal edu- 
cation there is great inequality of parts. And the 
woods of America^ as well as the fchools of Athens y 
produce men of feveral abilities in the fame kind. 
Though this be fo, yet I imagine moft men come 
very fhort of what they might attain unto in their 
fcveral degrees by a neglec't of their understand- 
ings. A few rules of logic are thought fufHcient 
in this cafe for thofe who pretend to the higheft 
improvement-, whereas I think there are a great 
many natural defects in the underftanding capable 
cf amendment, which are overlooked and wholly 
neglected. And it is eafy to perceive that men 
are guilty of a great many faults in the exercife 
and improvement cf this faculty of the mind, 
which hinder them in their progrefs, and keep 
them in ignorance and error all their lives. Some 
of them I (Hall take notice of, and endeavour to 
point out proper remedies for in the following dif- 
courfe. 



SECTION III. 
REASONING. 

Beildes the want of determined ideas, and of 
fagacity, and exercife in finding out, and laying 
in order intermediate ideas, there are three mil- 
carriages that men are guilty of in reference to 
their reafon, whereby this faculty is hindered in 
them from that fervice it might do and was de- 
figned for. And he that reflects upon the actions 



THE UNDERSTANDING. £ 

REASONING. 

and difcourfes of mankind, will find their defects 
in this kind very frequent and very obfervable. 

i. The firft is of thofe who feldom reafon at 
all, but do and think according to the example 
of others, whether parents, neighbours, minifters, 
or whom elfe they are pleafed to make choice of to 
have an implicit faith in, for the faving of them- 
felves the pains and trouble of thinking and exa- 
mining for themfelves. 

2. The fecond is of thofe who put paffion in the 
place of reafon, and being refolved that fhail go- 
vern their actions and arguments, neither ulc 
their own, nor hearken to other people's reafon, 
any farther than it fuits their humour, intereft, 
or party ; and thefe one may obferve commonly 
content themfclves with words which have no di- 
itinct ideas to them, though, in other matters, 
that they come with an unbiafFed indifference to, 
they want not abilities to talk and hear reafon, 
where they have no fecret inclination that hinders 
•them from being tractable to it. 

3. The third fort is of thofe who readily and 
fincerely follow reafon, but for want of having 
that which one may call large y founds rcund about 

fenfe, have not a full view of ail that relates to 
the queftion, and may be of moment to decide it. 
We are all fhcrt-fighted, and very often ice but 
one fide of a matter ; our views are not extended 
to all that has a connection with it. From this 
defect I think no man is free. "We fee but in 
part, and we know but In part, and therefore it 
U no wonder we conclude not right from our par- 
tial views. This might inftruct the proudeft c£- 

B3 



d THE CONDUCT OP 

REASONING. 

teemer of his own parts, how uftful it is to talk 
and confult with others, even fuch as come fhort 
o : :' him in capacity, quicknefs and penetration : 
for fince no one fees all, and we generally have 
different profpecls of the fame thing, according 
to our different, as I may fay, portions to it, it 
is not incongruous to think, nor beneath any 
man to try, whether another may not have no- 
tions of things which have efcaped him, and which 
his reafon would make ufe of if they came into 
his mind. The faculty of reafoning feldom or 
never deceives thofe who truft to it ; its confe- 
rences from what it builds on are evident and 
certain, but that which it ofteneit, if not only, 
mifleads us in, is, that the -principles from which 
we conclude, the grounds upon which we bottom 
our reafoning, are but a part, fomething is left 
out which mould go into the reckoning to make 
it juft and exact. Here we may imagine a vaft 
and almoft infinite advantage that angels and fepa- 
rate fpirits may have over us ; who in their fe- 
veral degrees of elevation above vis, may be en- 
dowed with more comprehensive faculties, and 
fome of them perhaps have perfect and exact 
views of all -finite beings that come under their 
confideration, can, as it were, in the twinkling of 
an eye, collect together all their fcattered and al- 
moft boundlefs relations. A mind lb furnifhed, 
what reafon has it to acquiefce in the certainty of 
its conclufions ! 

In this we may fee the reafon why fome men of 
ftudy and thought, that reafon right, and are 
lovers of tiuth, do make no great advances in 
their diicoveries of it. Error and truth are un- 
certainly blended in their minds j their decilions 



THE UNDERSTAND I- NC. 7 

REASONING. 

are lame and defective, and they are very often 
miftaken in their judgments : the reafon whereof 
is, they converfe but with one ibrt of men, they 
read but one fort of books, they will not come in 
the hearing but of one fort of notions ; the truth 
is, they canton out to themfelves a little Goflen 
in the intellectual world, where light (bines, and, 
as they conclude, clay blefTes them j but the reft 
of that vaft Expanjum they give up to night and 
darknefs, and fo avoid coming near it. They 
have a pretty trafnck with known correfpondents 
in fome little creek, within that they confine 
themfelves, and are dexterous managers enough 
of the wares and products of that corner with 
which they content themfelves, but will not ven- 
ture out into the great ocean of knowledge, to 
furvey the riches that nature hath ftored other 
parts with, no lefs genuine, no lets folid, no lefs 
ufeful, than what has fallen to their lot in the 
admired plenty and fufficiency of their own little 
fpot, which to them contains whatfoever is good 
in the univerfe. Thofe who live thus mewed up 
.within their own contracted territories, and will 
not look abroad beyond the boundaries that 
chance, conceit, or laxlnefs has fet to their enqui- 
ries, but live feparate from the notions, dii- 
courfes and attainments of the reft of mankind, 
may not amifs be reprefentcd by the inhabitants 
of the Marian iflancls ; who being feparated by 
a large tract of fea from all commi.uion with the 
habitable parts of the earth, thought themselves 
the only people of the world. And though 
the ftraitnefs of the conveniences of life a- 
niongft them had never reached fo far as to the 
ufoof fire till the Spaniards, not many years ilnce, 



t THE CONDUCT OF 

REASONING. 

in their voyages from Acapuko to Manilla brought 
it amongft them ; yet in the want and ignorance 
of almoft all things, they looked upon themfelves 
even after that the Spaniards had brought amongft 
them the notice of variety of nations abounding 
in fciences, arts and conveniences of life, of which, 
they knew nothing, they looked upon themfelves, 
I fay, as the happieft and wifeft people of the 
univerfe. But for all that, no body, I think, will 
imagine them deep naturalifts, or lolid metaphy- 
sicians ; no body will deem the quickeft lighted 
amongft them to have very enlarged views in ethics 
or politics, nor can any one allow the moft capa- 
ble amongft them to be advanced fo far in his un- 
derstanding, as to have any other knowledge but 
of the few little things of his and the neigh- 
bouring iflands within his commerce; but far 
enough from that comprchenfive enlargement 
of mind which adorns a foul devoted to truth, 
affifted with letters, and a free consideration 
of the feverai views and fentiments of think- 
ing men of all fides. -Let not men there- 
fore that would have a fight of, what every one 
pretends to be deflrous to have a fight of, truth 
in its full extent, narrow and blind their own 
profpecl. Let not men thick there is no truth 
but in the fciences that they ftudy, or the books 
that they read. To prejudge other men's notions 
before we have looked into them, is not to mew 
their darknefs, but to put out our own eyes. Try 
all things, hold faft that ivhich is good, is a divine 
rule coming from the Father of light and truth ; 
and it is hard to know what other way men can 
come at truth, to lay hold of it, if they do not 
dig and fearch for it as for gold and hid treafure ; 
but he that does fo muft have much earth and 



THE UNDERSTANDING. .£ 

REASONING. 

rubbifh before he gets the pure metal ; fand, and 
pebbles, and drofs ufually lie blended with it, but 
the gold is neverthelefs gold, and will enrich the 
man that employs his pains to feek and feparate 
it. Neither is there any danger he fhould be de- 
ceived by the mixture. Every man carries about 
him a touchftone, if he will make ufe of it, to 
diftinguifh fubftantial gold from fuperfkial glit- 
terings, truth from appearances. And indeed the 
ufe and benefit of this touchftone, which is na- 
tural reafon, is fpoiled and loft only by afTumed 
prejudices, overweening prefumption, and nar- 
rowing our minds. The want of exercifing it in 
the full extent of things intelligible, is that which 
weakens and extinguishes this noble faculty in us. 
Trace it, and fee whether it be not fo. Tbe day 
labourer in a country village has commonly but 
a fmall pittance of knowledge, becaufe his ideas 
and notions have been confined to the narrow 
bounds of a poor converfation and employment : 
the low mechanic of a country town does fome- 
what outdo him ; porters and cobblers of great 
-cities furpafs them. A country gentleman, who 
leaving Latin and learning in the univerfity, re- 
moves thence to his manfion houfe > and aftbeiates 
with neighbours of the fame ftrain, who relifh 
nothing but hunting and a bcttlc ; with thofe 
alone he fpends his time, with thofe alone he 
converfes, and can away with no company whofe 
difcourfe goes beyond what claret and dilTblute- 
aefs infpire. Such a patriot, formed in this hap- 
py way of improvement, cannot fail, as we fee, 
to give notable deciiions upon the bench at quar- 
ter i'eliions, and eminent proofs of his ikill in po- 
litics, when the ftrength of his purfe and party 
have advanced him to a more conspicuous ftation. 



I© THE CONDUCT OF 

REASONING. 

To fuch a one truly an ordinary coffee-hcufe 
gleaner of the city is an errant flatefman, and as 
much fupericr to, as a man converfant about 
White-hall and the court, is to an ordinary fhop- 
keeper. To carry this a little farther. Here is 
one muffled up in the zeal and infallibility of his 
own feet, and will not touch a book, or enter 
into debate with a perfon that will queftion any 
of thofe things which to him are facred. Ano- 
ther furveys our differences in religion, with an 
equitable and fair indifference, and fo finds pro- 
bably that none of them are in every thing unex- 
ceptionable. Thefe divifions and fyftems were 
made by men, and carry the mark of fallible on 
them; and in thofe whom he differs from, and 
till be opened his eyes, had a general prejudice 
againft, he meets with more to be faid for a great 
many things than before he was aware of, or 
could have imagined. Which of thefe two now 
is rnofl likely to judge right in our religious ccii- 
troverfies, and to be moft frored with truth, the 
mark all pretend to aim at ? All thefe men that 
I have inftanced in, thus unequally furnifhed with 
truth, and advanced in knowledge, I fuppofe of 
equal natural parts \ all the odds between ihem 
has been the different fcope that has been given 
to their underftandings to range in, for the ga- 
thering up of information, and furnifhing their 
heads with ideas, notions and observations, where- 
on to employ their minds, and form their under- 
Handings. 

It will poffibly be obje&edj who is fufKcient 
for all this ? I anfwer, more than can be ima- 
gined. Every one knows what his proper bufinefs 
is., and what, according to the character he r. 



THE UNDERSTANDING. II 

REASONING. 

of himfelf, the world may juftly expect of him $ 
and to anfwer that, he will find he will have 
time and opportunity enough to furnifh himfelf, 
if he will not deprive himfelf by a narrowncfs of 
fpirit, of thofe helps that are at hand. I do not 
fay to be a good geographer that a man fhould 
vilit every mountain, river, promontory and creek 
upon the face of the earth, view the buildings, 
and furvey the land every where, as if he were 
going to make a purchafe. But yet every one 
muft allow, that he fhali know a country better 
that makes often Tallies into it, and traveries it up 
and down, than he that like a mill horfe goes 
fliii round in the fame track, or keeps within the 
narrow bounds of a field or two that delight him. 
He that will enquire out the beft books in every 
fcience, and inform himfelf of the moft material 
authors of the feveral feels of philofophy and re- 
ligion, will not find it an infinite work to acquaint 
himfelf with the fentiments of mankind concern- 
ing the moft weighty and comprehenfive fubjects. 
Let him exercife the freedom of his reafon and 
underitanding in fuch a latitude as this, and his 
mind will be itrengthened, his capacity enlarged, 
his faculties improved : and the light which the 
remote and festered parts of truth will give to 
one another, will fo aililt his judgment, that he 
will feldom be widely out, or mifs giving proof of 
a clear head, and a comprehenfive knowledge. 
At lead, this is the only way I know to give the 
underitanding it's due improvement, to the full 
extent of its capacity, and to diftinguifli the two 
moft different things I know in the world, a lo- 
gical chicaner from a man of reafon. Only he 
that would thus give the mind its flight, and 
fend abroad his enquiries into ail parts after truth, 



12 THE CONDUCT CJ 

PRACTICE AND HABITS. 

mutt be fure to fettle in his head determined ideas 
of all that he employs his thoughts about, and 
never fail to judge himfelf, and judge unbiafTedly 
of all that he receives from others, either in their 
writings or difcourfes. Reverence or prejudice 
muft not be fuffered to give beauty or deformity j 
to any of their opinions. 



SECTION IV. 
PRACTICE AND HABIT S. 

We are born with faculties and powers capa- 
ble almoft of any thing, fuch at leaft as would 
carry us farther than can eafily be imagined : but 
it is only the exercife of thofe powers which gives 
us ability and fkill in any thing, and leads us to- 
wards perfection. 

A middle aged ploughman will fcarce ever be 
brought to the carriage and language of a gentle- 
man, though his body be as well proportioned, 
and his joints as fupple, and his natural parts not 
any way inferior. The legs of a dancing matter, 
and the fingers of a mufician fall as it were natu- 
rally without thought or pains into regular and 
admirable motions. Bid them change their parts, 
and they will in vain endeavour to produce like 
motions in the members not ufed to them, and it 
will require length of time and long practice to 
attain but fome degrees of a like ability. What 
incredible and altonifhing actions do we find rope- 
dancers and tumblers bring their bodies to ; not 
but that fundry in almoft all manual arts are as 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 1 3 

PRACT1 D HABITS. 

wonderful ; but I ' ofe which the world 

takes notice of for fuch, hecaufe on that very ac- 
count, they give money to fee them. All thefe- 
admir- : yond the reach, and almoft the 

conception of 1. fed fpectatcrs, are nothing 

but the mere errlcts of ufe and induftry in men, 
whefe bodies have nothing peculiar in them from 
thofe of the amazed lookers en. 

As it is in the body, To it is in the mind; 
ce makes it what it is, and mod even or 
thofe excellencies which are looked on as natural 
endowments, will lz-z found when examined into 
more narrowly, to be the produce of exc; c 
and to be ivofed to that pitch only by rep-:, 
actions. Some men are remarked for pleafantncfs 
in raillery ; others for apologues and appoflte di- 
verting ftories. This is apt to be taken for the 
effect of pure nature, and that the rather, be- 
-caufe it is not get by rule?, and thofe who excel 
in either of them, never purpofcly let themfclves 
to the ftudy of it as an art to be learnt. But yet 
it is true, that at firft fome lucky hit which took 
with feme b:dy, and gained him commendation, 
encouraged him to try again, inclined his thoughts 
and endeavours that way, till at laft he infeniibly 
got a facility in it without perceiving how, and 
that is attributed wholly to nature, which was 
much more the effect of life and practice. I do 
not deny that natural difpcfltion may often give 
the fir ft rife to it ; but that never carries a man 
far without ufe and excrcife, and it is practice^ 
alone that brings the powers of the mind as well 
as thofe of the body to their perfection. Many a 
good poetic vein is buried under a trade, and 
never produces any thing for want of improvc- 



14 THE CON'DUCT OS 

PRACTICE AND HABITS. 

ment. We fee the ways of difcourfe and reafbn- 
ing are very different, even concerning the fame 
matter, at court and in the univeriity. And lie 
that will go but from Weftminfter-hall to the Ex- 
change^ will find a different genius and turn in 
their ways of talking, and yet one cannot think 
that all whofe lot fell in the city were born with 
different parts from thofe who were bred at the 
univerfity or inns of court. 

To what purpofe all this, but to {hew that the 
cifference fo obfervabie in men's underftandings 
and parts, does net arife fo much from their na- 
tural faculties as acquired habits. He would be 
laughed at that mould go about to make a fine 
dancer out of a country hedge;-, at paft fifty. — 
And he will not have much better fuccefs, who 
fhall endeavour at that age to make a man reafon 
we!!, or fpeak handibmely who has never been 
ufed to it, though you mould lay before him a 
collection of all the bell precepts of logic or ora- 
No body is made any thing by hearing of 
. -, or laying them up in his memory; prac- 
tice muft fettle the habit of doing without reflect- 
ing on the rule, and you may as well hope to 
make a good painter or mulician extempore by a 
lecture and instruction in the arts of muiic and 
painting, as a coherent thinker, or flrict reafoner 
by a fet of rules, mewing him wherein right rea- 
ibning coniifts. 

This being fo that defects and weaknefs in 
men's underftandings, as well as other faculties, 
come from want of a right ufe of their own minds, 
I am apt to think the fault is generally millaid 
upon nature, and there is often a complaint of 



THE UNDERSTANDING. I 5 

PRINCIPLES. 

want of parts, when the fault lies in want of a 
due improvement of them. We fee men fre- 
quently dextrous and {harp enough in making a 
bargain, who, if you reafon with them about 
matters of religion, appear perfectly ilupid. 



SECTION V. 
IDEAS, 

I will not here, in what relate? to the right 
conduct and improvement of the underftanding, 
repeat again the getting CLEAR AND DETER- 
MINED IDEAS, and the employing our thoughts 
rather about them, than about founds put for 
them, nor of fettling the iigniiicr.ticn of words 
which we ufe with ourfclves In the fcarch of truth, 

or with others in difcourfing about it. Thole: 

hindrances of our underftandings in the purfuit of 
knowledge, I have fufHciently enlarged upon in 
another place; ih that nothing more needs here 
to be (aid of thofe matters. 



SECTION VI. 
PRINCIPLES. 

There is another fault that flops or mi fie ads 
men in their knowledge, which I have alio fpo- 
ken fomething of, but yet is necefTary to mention 
here again, that we may examine it to the bot- 
tom, and fee the root it fprings from, and that 
is, a cuftom of taking up with principles that are 
C 2 



1 6 THE CO N DUCT F 

PRINCIPLES. 

not felf-evldent, and very often not fo tnueh ^s 
true. It is notunufuai to Ice men reft their opi- 
nions upon foundations that have ko more cer- 
tainty and than the propositions built on 
them, and embraced for their fake. Such foun- 
dations are thefe and the like, viz. the founders 
or Leaden of my party are good men, and there- 
fore their tenets are true ; it is the opinion of a 
feet that is erroneous, therefore it is falfe •, it 
hath been long received in the world, therefore 
true 3 or it is new, and therefore faife. 

Thefe, and many the like, which are by no 
means the meafures of truths and falfhood, the 

generality of men make the ftandards by which 
r underftanding to judge. And 

thus they falling into a habit of determining truth 

; wrong meafures, it is no 

Id embrace error for certainty, 

and be very podtlvjs in things they h..ve no ground 

for. 

re is not any who pretends to the I c :; Tc 
reafon, but when any of t lit ft his faife maxims 
are brought to the tcft, mull acknowledge them 
to be fallible, and fuch as he will not allow in 
thofe that diner from him ; zr.d yet after lie is 

meed of thip, you (hall lee him go on in the 
ufe of them, and the very n.xt occafion that of- 
fers argue again upon the fame grounds. V. 
i e not be ready to think that men are willii 
imppfe upon themiclyes, and miflead their own 
iinderftandings, wh i by fucli wrong 

meafures, even after they fee they cannot be re- 

on ? But yet they will not appear fo blame- 
. thought at firft fight; for I think 



T HE C N D E R 5 T A M DING. I 7 

PRINCIPLES. 

there are a great many that argue thus in earneft, 
and do it not to impofe on themfelves or others. 
They are perfuaded of what they fay, and think 
there is weight in it, though in a like cafe they 
have been convinced there is none ; but men 
would be intolerable to themfelves, and contemp- 
tible to others, if they fhould embrace opinions 
without any ground t and hold what they could 
give no manner of reafon for. True or falfe, 
folid or fandy, the mind muft have fome founda- 
tion to reft itfelf upon, and as I have remarked 
in another place, it no fooner entertains any pro- 
pofition, but it prefently haftens to fome hypo- 
thefis to bottom it on ; till then it is unquiet and 
unfettled. So much do our own very tempers 
difpofe us to a right ufe of our understandings if 
we would follow as we fhould the inclinations of 
our nature. 

In f<Shie matters of concernment, efpecially 
thofe of religion, men are not permitted to be al- 
ways wavering and uncertain, they muft embrace 
and profefs fome tenets or other ; and it would 
be a fliame, nay, a contradiction too heavy for 
any one's mind to lie conftantly under, for him 
to pretend ferioufiy to be perfuaded of the truth 
of any religion, and yet not to be able to give 
any reafon of his belief, or to fay any tiring for 
bis preference of this to any other opinion ; and 
therefore they muft make ufe of fome principles 
or other, and thofe can be no other than fuch as 
they have and can manage ; and to fay they are 
not in earneft perfuaded by them, and do not reft 
upon thofe they make ufe of, is contrary to ex- 
perience, and to alledge that they are not mifled 
when we complain thev are. 
C 3 



1 8 THE CONDUCT OF 

PRINCIPLES. 

If this be fay it will be urged, why then do 
they not rather make ufe of fure and unqueftion- 
able principles, than reft on fuch grounds as may 
deceive them, and will, as is viable, ferve to fup- 
port error as well as truth : 

To this I anfwer, the reafon why they do no: 
make uie of better and furer principles, is becaufe 
they cannot: but this inability proceeds net from 
want of natural pares (for thole few whofe cafe 
that is are to be excufed) but for want of life and 
cxercife. Few men- are from their youth accuf- 
tomed to ftrict reafoning, and to trace the depen- 
ance of any truth in a long train of coniequences 
to its remote principles, and to obferve its con- 
nection ; and he that by frequent practice has not 
been ufed to this employment of his understand- 
ing, it is no more wonder that he mould not, 
when he is grown into years, be able to bring his 
mind to it, than that he mould not be on a fud- 
den able to grave or defign, dance on the ropes, 
or write a good hand, who has never pra^ 
cither of them. 

Nay, the meft of men are fo wholly ft rangers 
to this, that they do not fo much as perceive 
their want of it, tl rtch the 

nefs of th by rote, 

have learnt it, and if at any rime they mifs fuc- 
cefs, they impute it to kg rather than want 

of thought or fkill ; that they conclude (becaufe 
they know no better) they have in perfection ; or 
if there be any fubject that intereft or fancy has 
recommended to their thoughts, their reafoning 
about it is frill after their bet- 

ter or worfe, it fcrves their turns, and is the beft 



THE UNDERSTANDING* i 9 

PRINCIPLES. 

they are acquainted with ; and therefore when 
they are led by it into miftakes, and their bufi- 
nefs fucceeds accordingly, they impute it to any 
crofs accident, or default of others, rather than 
to their own want of undemanding ; that is, 
what no body difcovers or complains of in him- 
felf. Whatibever made his bufmefs to mi "carry, 
it was not want of right thought and judgment 
in himfelf : he ices no fucli defect in himfelf, but 
is fatisfied that he carries on h : s detlgns well 
enough by his own .reafoning, cr at leaft fhould 
have done, had it not been for unlucky traverfes 
not in his power. Thus being content with this 
fhort and very imperfect ufeof his underitanding, 
he never troubles himfelf to feek out methods of 
improving his mind, and lives all his life with- 
out any notion of clofe reafoning, in a continued 
connection of a 'long train of confequences from 
fure foundations, fuch as is requifite for the mak- 
ing out, and clearing moft of the fpecularive 
truths molt men own to believe, and are mod 
concerned in. Not to mention here what I (hall 
have occallon to infill on by and by more fully, 
viz. that in many cafes it is not one feries of con- 
fequences will ferve the turn, but many different 
and oppofite deductions muft be examined and 
laid together, before a man can come to make a 
right judgment of the point in queftion. What 
then can be expected from men that neither fee 
the want of any fuch kind of reafoning as this; 
nor if they do, know they how to fief about it, 
or could perform it ? You may as well fet a coun- 
tryman who fcarce knows the figures, and never 
caft up a fum of three particulars, to (tare a 
merchant's long account, and find the true ba- 
lance of it. 



XO THE CONDUCT OF 

PRINCIPLES. 

What then fhould be done in the cafe ? I anfwer, 
we fhould always remember what I faid above, 
that the faculties of our fouls are improved and 
made ufeful to us, juft after the fame manner 
as our bodies are. Would you have a man write 
or paint, dance or fence well, or perform any other 
manual operation dexteroufly and with eafe, let 
him have ever fo much vigour and activity, fup- 
plenefs andaddrefs naturally, yet no body expects 
this from him unlefs he has been ufed to it, and has 
employed time and pains in faihioning and forming 
his hand or outward parts to thefe notions. Juft fo 
it is in the mind, would you have a man reafon well, 
you mufl ufe him to it betimes, exercife his mind 
in obferving the connection of ideas, and following 
them in train. Nothing does this better than ma- 
thematics, which therefore I think fhould be taught 
all thofe who have the time and opportunity, not fo 
much to make them mathematicians as to make 
them reafonable creatures ; for though we all call 
ourfelves fo, becaufe we are born to it if we pleafe, 
yet we may truly fay nature gives us but the feeds 
of it ; we are born to be, if we pleafe, rational 
creatures, but it is ufe and exercife only that makes 
us fo, and we are indeed fo no farther than induflry 
and application has carried us. And therefore in 
ways of reafoning which men have not been ufed to, 
he that will obferve the conclufions they take up, 
mud be fatisfied they are not all rational. 

This has been the lefs taken notice of, becaufe 
every one in his private affairs, ufes fome fort of 
reafoning or other, enough to denominate him 
reafonable. But the miftake is, that he that is 
found reafonable hi one thing is concluded to 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 21 

PRINCIPLES. 

be Co in all, and to think or fay otherwife, is 
thought fo unjuft an affront, and To fenfelcfe a 
cenfure, that no body ventures to do it. It looks 
like t n of a man below the dignity 

of his nature. It is true, that he that reafons 
well in any one thing, has a mind naturally ca- 
pable of reafoning well in others, and to the fame 
degree of ftrength and clearnefs, and pofTibly 
much greater, had his understanding been fo em- 
ployed. But it is as true, that he who can rea- 
fon well to-day about one fort of matters, cannot 
at all reafon to-day about others, though perhaps 
a year hence he may. But wherever a man's ra- 
tional faculty fails him, and will not ferve him 
to reafon, there we cannot fay he is rational, how 
capable foever he may be by time and exercife to 
become io. 

Try in men of low and mean education, who 
have never elevated their thoughts above the fpade 
[■.net the plough, nor looked beyond the ordinary 
drudgery of a day labourer. Take the thoughts 
of fuch an one, ufed for many years to one track, 
out of that narrow compafs he has been all his 
. Dnfined to, you will find him no more capa- 
ble of reafoning than almoft a perfect natural. — - 
s one or two rules on which their conclu- 
sions immediately depend, you will find in mod 
men have governed ail their thoughts ; thefe, 
true or falfe, have been the maxims they have 
guided by: take thefe from them, and they 
are perfecdy at a lofs, their compafs and pole ftar 
ne, and their underftapding is 
a nonplus, and therefore they either iir- 
mediately return to their old maxims again as the 
dations of ail truth to than, notwithftanding 



22 THE CONDUCT OF 

PRINCIPLES. 

all that can be faid to fhew their weaknefs ; or 
if they give them up to their reafcns, they with 
them give up all truth and further enquiry, and 
think there is no fuch thing as certainty. For if 
you would enlarge their thoughts, and fettle them 
upon more remote and furer principles, they ei- 
ther cannot eafily apprehend them, or if they can, 
know not what ufe to make of them ; for long 
deductions from remote principles, is what they 
have not been ufed to, and cannot manage. 

What then, can grown men never be improved 
or enlarged in their understandings ? I fay not 
fo, but this I think I may fay, that it will not be 
done without mduftry and application, which will 
require more time and pains than grown men, 
fettled in their courfe of life, will allow to it, and 
therefore very feldom is done. ( And this very 
capacity of attaining it by ufe and exercife only, 
brings us back to that which I laid down before, 
that it is only practice that imprcves our minds 
as well as bodies, and we muft expect nothing 
from our understandings any farther than they 
are perfected by habits, 3 

The Americans are not all born with wcrfe un- 
derstandings than the Europeans, though we fee 
none of them have fuch reaches in the arts and 
Sciences. And among the children of a poor 
countryman, the lucky chance of education and 
getting into the world, gives one infinitely the 
iuperiority in parts over the reft, who continuing 
at home, had continued alfo juft of the fame fize 
with his brethren. 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 23 

MATHEMATICS. 

He that has to do with young fcholars, efpe- 
eially in mathematics, may perceive how their 
minds open by degrees, and how it is exercife 
alone that opens them. Sometimes they will flick 
a long time at a part of a demonftration, not for 
want of will and application, but really for want 
of perceiving the connection of two ideas; that, to 
onf. whole underftanding is more exercifed, is as 
■viiible as any thing can be. The fame would be 
with a grown man beginning to ftudy mathema- 
tics *, the underftanding for want of ufe, often 
fticks in very plain way, and he himfelf that is 
fo puzzled, when he comes to fee the connec- 
tion, wonders what it was he ftuck at in a cafe fo 
plain. 



SECTION VII. 
MATHEMATICS. 

I have mentioned mathematics as a way to 
fettle in the mind an habit of reafoning clofely 
and in train ; not that I think it necdiary that 
all men mould be deep mathematicians, but that 
having got the way of reafoning, which that ftudy 
neceflarily brings the mind to, they might be able 
to transfer it to other parts of knowledge as they 
(hall have occalion. For in all forts of reafoning, 
every fingle argument fhould be managed as a 
mathematical demonftration, the connection and 
dependance of ideas ihould be followed till the 
mind is brought to the fource on which it bot- 
toms, and obferves the coherence all along, though 
in proofs of probability, one fuch train is not 



24 THE CONDUCT OF 

MATHEMATICS. 

enough to fettle the judgment as in demonftrative 
knowledge. 

Where a truth is made out by one demoriftra- 
tion, there needs no farther enquiry, but in pro- 
babilities where there wants demonftration to efta- 
biifh the truth beyond doubt, there it is net 
enough to trace one argument to its fource, and 
obferve its ftrength' and wtaknefs, but all the 
arguments, after having been fo examined on both 
rides, mutt be laid in balance one again ft another, 
and upon the whole the underftanding determine 
its alTent. 

This is away ofreafoning the underftanding 
Ihould be accuftsmed to, which is fo different 
from what the illiterate are uied to, that even, 
learned men oftentimes feern to have very little or 
no notion of it. Nor is it to be wondered, fince 
the way of difputing in the fchools leads them quite 
away from it, by infiiring on one topical argu- 
ment, by the fuccefs of which the truth or false- 
hood of the queftion is to be determined, and vic- 
tory adjudged to the opponent or defend ant ; 
which is all one as one mould balance an account 
by one iiim charged and difcharged, when there 
aie an hundred others to be taken into conflde- 
ration. 

This therefore it would be well if men's minds 
were accuftomed to, and that early, that ihey 
might not erect their opinions upon one angle 
view, when fo many other are requifite to make 
up the account, and muft come into the reckon- 
ing before a man can form, a right judgment. 

This would enlarge their minds, and give a due 



THE UNDERSTANDING. It 

MATHEMATICS. 

freedom to their understandings, that they might 
not be led into error by prefumption, lazinefs, or 
precipitancy ; for I think no body can approve 
fach a conduct of the understanding, as mould 
miilead it from truth, though it be ever To much 
in fafhion to make ufe of it. 

To this perhaps it wiH be objected, that to ma- 
nage the understanding, as I propofe, would rc- 
-quire every man to be a fcholar, and to be fur- 
nifhed with all the materials of knowledge, and 
exercifed in all the ways of reafoniog. To which 
I anfwer, that it is a lhame for thofe that have 
time, and the means to attain knowledge, to want 
any helps or afliftance for the improvement of 
their understandings, that are to be got, and to 
fuch I would be thought here chiefly to fpeak. — 
Thofe, methinks, who by the induitry and parts 
of their anceftors, have been fet free from a con- 
stant drudgery to their backs and their bellies, 
fhould beftow fome of their fpare time on their 
heads, and open their minds by feme trials and 
effays in all the forts and matters of reafoning. 
I have before mentioned mathematics, wherein al- 
gebra gives new helps and views to the under- 
Handing. If I propofe thefe, it is not, as I faid, 
to make every man a thorough mathematician, or 
a deep algebra ill ; but yet I think the ftudy of 
them is of infinite ufe even to grown men -, firffc 
by experimentally convincing them, that to make 
any one reafon well, it is not enough to have parts 
wherewith he is fatisiied, and that ferve him well 
enough in his ordinary courfe. A man in thofe 
ftudies will fee, that however good he may think 
his undemanding, yet in many things, and : 
very it may fail him. This' would take 

D 



26 THE CONDUCT 07 

MATHEMATICS. 

off that prefumption that moft men have of thern- 
iclves in this part ; and they would not be Co apt 
to think their minds wanted no helps to enlarge 
them, that there could be nothing added to the 
acutenefs and penetration of their underftand- 
ings. 

Secondly, The ftudy of mathematics would 
(hew them the neceility there is in reafoning, to 
feparafe all the diftindt ideas, and fee the habi- 
tudes that all thofe concerned in the prefent en- 
quiry have to one another, and to lay by thole 
which relate not to the proposition in hand, and 
wholly to leave them out of the reckoning. — ■ — 
This is that, which in other fubjecte befides quan- 
tity, is what is abfolutely Ytrquifite to juft reafon- 
ing, though in them^. it is not fo eafily obferved, 

nor fo carefully praclifed. In thofe parts of 

knowledge where it is thought demonftration has 
nothing to do, men reafon as it were in the lump; 
and if upon a fummary and confufed view r , or 
upon a partial confideration, they can raife the- 
appearance of a probability, they uiually reft con- 
tent -, efpecially if it be in a difpute where every 
little itraw « laid hold on, and every thing that 
can but be drawn in anv way to give colour to 
the argument, is advanced with oftentation. but 
that mind is not in a pofture to find the truth, 
that does not diitinctly take all the parts afunder, 
and omitting what is not at all to the point, draw 
a conclusion from the refult of all the particulars 
which any way influence it. 'There is another no 
lefs ufeful habit to be got by an application to 
mathematical demonltrations, and that is, of uf- 
ing the mind to a long train of cocfequences ; 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 2 J 

RELIGION. 

but having mentioned that already, I (hall not 
again here repeat it. 

cut*. 
As to men whofe fortunes and time ^nar- 
rower, what may fuffice them is not of that vaft 
extent as may be imagined, and ib comes not 
within tl* objection. 

No body is under an obligation to kno ■ every 
thing. Knowle Ige and fcience in general, is the 
bulinefs only of thofe who are at eafe and leii 
Thofe who have particular callings ought to un- 
derftand them ; and it is no unreafonable pro- 
pofat, nor impofiible to be compaiTed, that they 
fhould think and reafon right about what is their 

employment. This one cannot th 
incapable of, without levelling them with the 
brutes, and charging them with a fcopicbty below 
the rank of rational creatures. 



SECTION VIII. 
R E L I G I O N. 

Befides his particular calling for the fupport of 
life, every one has a concern in a future 
life, which he is bound to look after. This en- 
gages his thoughts in religion ; and here it migh- 
tily lies upon him to undcrftand and reafon right. 
Men therefore cannot be excufed from under- 
ling the words, and framing the general no- 
tions relating to religion, right. The one day 
of feven, befides other days of reft, allows in the 
chriftian world time enough for this (had ;hev 
D 2 



28 THE CONDUCT OF 

RELIGION. 

no other idle hours') if they would but make ufc 
of thefe vacancies from their daily labour, and 
apply themfelves to an improvement of know- 
ledge, with as much diligence as they often do to 
a great many other things that are ufelefs, and if 
they had but thofe that would enter them according 
fo their feveral capacities in a right w. y to this 
knowledge. The original make of their minds is 
like tlin of other men, and they would be found 
not to want underftanding lit to receive the know- 
ledge of religion, if they were a little encouraged 
ami helped in it as t.hty fhould be. For there arc 
inftances of very mean people, who have raifed 
their minds to a great fen ft and underftanding of 
religion. And though thefe have not been Co 
free. nent as could br w'.fhed, yet they are enough 
to clear that condition of life from a neceility of 
ftrofs ignorance, and to fhew that more might be 
brought to be rational creatures and chriftians,. 
they can hardly be thought really to be lb, 
who wearing the name, know not fo much as the 
very principles of that religion) if due care were 
taken of them. For, if I miftake not, the pea- 
santry latejj in France (a rank of people under a 
much heavier preffure of want and poverty than 
the day labourers in England) of the reformed 
religion, under (food it much better, and could 
fay more for it, than thofe of a higher condition 



Eut if it fhall be concluded that the meaner 
fort of people muft give themfelves up to a bru- 
tifh ftupidity in the things of their neareft con- 
cernment, which I fee no reafon for, this ex- 
cufes not thofe of a freer fortune and education, 
if they neglect their underftandings, and take no 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 2p 

IDEAS. 

care to employ them as they ought, and fht them 
right in the knowledge of thofe things, for which 
principally they were given them. At leaft thofe 
whofe plentiful fortunes allow them the opportu- 
nities and helps of improvements, are not fo few, 
but that it might be hoped great advancements 
might be made in knowledge of all kinds, efpe- 
cially in that of the great eft concern and largeft 
views, if men would make a right ufe of their 
faculties, and ftudy their own underfbndings. 



SECTION IX. 
IDEAS. 

Outward corporeal objecrs that conftantiy im- 
portune our fenfes, and captivate our appetites, 
fail not to fill cur heads with lively and lafting 
ideas of that kind. Here the mind needs not be 
let upon getting greater (tore ; they offer them- 
fclves fail enough, and are ufually entertained in 
inch plenty, and lodged {o carefully, that the 
mind wants room or attention for others that it 
has more ufe and need of. To fit the under- 
standing therefore for fuch reafeming as I have 
tven a'x>ve fpeaking of, care ihould be taken to 
fill it with moral and more abfrract ideas ; for 
thefe not offering themfelves to the fenfes, but 
being to be framed to the underftanding, people 
are generally fo neglectful of a faculty they are 
apt to th nothing, that I fear moft men's 

minds are more unfurnimed with fuch ideas than 
is imagined. They often ufe the words, and how 
D 3 



jO THECONDUCTOF 

IDEAS. 

can they be fufpected to want the ideas ? What 
I have faid in the third book of my effay, will 
excufe me from any other anfwer to this queftion. 
But to convince people of what moment it is to 
their underftandings to be furnifhed with fuch 
abftracl ideas fteady and fettled in them, give me 
leave to afk how any one fhall be able to know, 
whether he be obliged to be juft, if he has not 
eftablifhed ideas in his mind, of obligation and of 
juftice ; fince knowledge confilts in nothing but 
the perceived agreement or difagreement of thofe 
ideas ; and fo of all others, the like which con- 
cern our lives and manners. And if men do find 
a difficulty to fee the agreement or difagreement 
of two angles which lie before their eyes, unal- 
terable in a diagram, how utterly impoffible will 
it be to perceive it in ideas that have no other fen- 
fible objects to reprefent them to the mind, but 
founds, with which they have no manner of con- 
formity, and therefore had need to be clearly 
fettled in the mind themfelves, if we would make 
any clear judgment about them ! This therefore 
is one of the fir ft things the mind fhould be em- 
ployed about in the right conduct of the under- 
standing, without which it is impoffible it fhould 
be capable of reafoning right about thofe matters. 
But in thefe, and all other ideas, care muft be 
taken that they harbour no inconfiftences, and 
that they have a real exiftence where real exist- 
ence is fuppofed, and are not mere chimeras with 
a ffippofed exiftence- 



THE UNDERSTANDING. £1 



SECTION X. 



PREJUDICE. 



Every one is forward to complain of the pre- 
judices that miflead other men or parties, as if he 
were free, and had none of his own. This be- 
ing objected on all fides, it is agreed, that it is a 
fault and an hindrance to knowledge. What now 
is the cure ? No other but this, that every man 
ihould let alone others' prejudices and examine 
his own. No body is convinced of his by the ac- 
cufation of another, he recriminates by the fame 
rule, and is clear. The only way to remove this 
great caufe of ignorance and error out of the 
world, is, for every one impartially to examine 
himfelf. If others will not deal fairly with their 
own minds, does that make my errors truths, 
or ought it to make me in love with them, and 
willing to impofe.on myfelf ? If others love cata- 
racts on their eyes, fhould that hinder me from 
couching of mine as foon as I could ? Every one 
declares againft blindnefs, and yet who almoft is 
not fond of that which dims his fight, and keeps 
the clear light out of his mind, which mould lead 
him into truth and knowledge ? Falfe or doubtful 
pofitions, relied upon as unqueftionable maxims, 
keep thofe in die dark from truth, who build on 
them. Such are ufually the prejudices imbibed 
from education, party, reverence, fafhion, inte- 
reft, &c. This is the mote which every one fees 
in his brother's eye, but never regards the beam 
in his own. For who is there almoft that is ever 
brought fairly to examine his own principles, and 



3 £ THE CONDUCT O 1 

PREJUDICE. 

fee whether they are fuch as will bear the trial ? 
but yet this fhould be one of the firft things every 
one fhould fet about, and be fcrupulous in, who- 
would rightly conduct his undemanding in the 
fearch of truth and knowledge. 

To thofe who are willing to get rid of this 
great hindrance of knowledge, (for to fuch only 
I write) to thofe who would fhake off this great 
and dangerous impoftor prejudice, who dreiTes 
up falfhood in the likenefs of truth, and fo dex- 
teroufly hoodwinks men's minds, as to keep them 
in the dark, with a belief that they are more in? 
the light than any that do not fee with their eyes, 
I (hall offer this one mark whereby prejudice may- 
be known. He that is ftrongly of any opinion, 
mud fuppofe (unltfs he be felf-condemned) that 
his perfuafion is built upon good grounds ; and 
that his affent is no greater than what the evi- 
dence of the truth he holds forces him to ; and 
that they are arguments, and not inclination or 
fancy that make him fo confident and pofltive in 
his tenets. Now if after all his profeffion, he 
cannot bear any opposition to his opinion, if he 
cannot fo much as give a patient hearing, much 
lcfs examine and weigh the arguments on the 
other fide, docs he not plainly confefs it is preju- 
dice governs him ? And it is not the evidence of 
truth, but fame lazy anticipation, fome beloved 
prefumpti-^i that he defires to reft undiftufbed in. 
For if what he holds be as he gives out, well 
fenced with evidence, and he fees it to be true, 
what need he fear to put it to the proof? If his 
opinion be fettled upon a firm foundation, if the 
arguments that fupport it, and have obtained his 
affent be clear, good, and convincing, why fhoulcl 



THE UNDERSTANDING 33 

1NDIFFERENCY. 

Tic be fhy to have it tried whether they be proof 
or not ? He whofe affent goes beyond his evi- 
dence, owes this excefs of his adherence only to 
prejudice, and does, in effect, own it, when he 
refufes to hear what is offered againft it ; de- 
claring thereby, that it is not evidence he feeks, 
but the quiet enjoyment of the opinion he is fond 
of, with a forward condemnation of all that may 
fiand in oppofuion to it, unheard and unexamin- 
ed ; which, what is it but prejudice ? S$ui aquum 
flatuerit parte inauditd alter a , et'iam fi aquum Jl a- 
Uteris hand aquas fuerit. He that would acquit 
himfelf in this cafe as a lover of truth, not giv- 
ing way to any pre-occupation, or bias that may 
miflead him, rauft do two things that are not very 
common, nor very eafy. 



SECTION XI. 

INDIFFERENCY. 

Firft, He mufr net be in love with any opi- 
nion, or wifh it to be true, till he knows it to 
be fo, and then he will not need to wifh it : for 
nothing that is falfe can deferve our good withes, 
nor a deiire that it fhould have the place and force 
of truth ; and yet nothing is more frequent than 
this. Men are fond of certain tenets upon no 
other evidence but refpect and cuflom, and think 
they mud maintain them, or all is gone, though 
they have never examined the ground they fbnd 
on, nor have ever made them out to others. We 
ihould contend earneftly for the truth, but we 



34 THE CONDUCT OF 

EXAMINE. 

fhould firft be fare that it is truth : or elfe we 
fight againft God, who is th: Cud of iroth, and 
do the work of the devil, wbc is the fi lur and 
propagator of lies ; and our zeal, though ever fa 
warm, will not excufe us •, fcr this is plainly pre- 



SECTION XII 



E X A M I N E. 

Secondly, He muft do that which he will find 
himfelf very averfe to, as judging the thing un- 
neceflary, or himfelf incapable of doing it. He 
muft try whether his principles be certainly true 
or not, and how far he may fafely rely on them. 
This, whether fewer have the heart or the fkiil 
to do, I fhall not determine ; but this I am fure, 
this is that which every one ought to do, who 
profeflts to love truth, and would not impofe 
upon himfelf •, which is a furer w r ay to be made a 
fool of than by being expofed to the fophiftry of 
others. The difpofition to put any cheat upon 
ourfelves works confb.ntly, and we are plea fed 
with it, but are impatient of being bantered or 
mifled by others. The inability I here fpeak of, 
is not any natural defect that makes men inca- 
pable of examining their own principles. To fuch, 
rules of conducting their underftandings are ufe- 
lefs, and that is the cafe of very few. The great 
number is of thofe whom the ill habit of never 
exerting their thoughts has difabled : the powers 
of their minds are ftarved by difufe, and have loft 
that reach and ftrength which nature fitted them 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 35 

EXAMINE. 

to receive from exercifc. Thofe who are in a 
condition to learn the firit rules of plain arithme- 
tic, and could be brought to caft up an ordinary 
ium, fere capable of this, if they had but accul- 
:ir minds to reafoning : but they that 
'y neglected the exercife of their under- 
fta I s «ray, will be very far ai !r,ril from 

beii'g able to do it, and as unfit for it as one un- 
pradiicci in figures to caft up a fhopbook, and 

perhaps think it as ftrange to be fet about it. 

And yet it muft neverthelefs be confefied to be a 
wrong uft rf our um'errtandmgs to build our te- 
nets (in things where we are concerned to hold 
the ti m principles that may lead us into 

error. We take our principles at hap-hazard upon 
trufi, and srtthcutf ever having examined them ; 
and I be! eve a whole fyrtctn, upon a prefump- 

tion that rhey are true and folic! ; and what is 
all this but childifh, Ciameful, ienfclefs credu- 
lity ? 

In thefe two things, viz. an equal indifferency 
for all truth ; I mean the receiving it in the love 
of it as truth, but not loving it for a ry other 
reafon before we know it to be true ; and in the 
examination of our principles, and not receiving 
any fcr i'uch, nor building on them till we are 
fully convinced, as rational creatures, of their fo- 
lidity, truth, and certainty, confnis that frei 
of the underitanding which is necefTary to a ratio- 
nal creature, and without which it is not truly 
an underitanding. It is conceit, fancy, extrava- 
gance, any thing rather than underitanding, if 
it muft be under the conftraint of receiving and 
holding opinions by the authority of any thing 
but their own, not fancied, but perceived, evi- 



36 THE CONDUCT OS 

EXAMINE. 

dence. This was rightly called impolition, and 
is of all others the worft and mod dangerous fort 
of it. For we impofe upon ourfelves, which is 
the ftrongeft impolition of all others ; and we im- 
pofe upon ourfelves in that part which ought with 
the greateft care to be kept free from all impo- 
fition. The world is apt to call great blame on 
thofe who have an indifferency for opinions, es- 
pecially in religion. I fear this is the foundation 
of great error and worfe confequences. To be 
indifferent which of two opinions is true, is the 
right temper of the mind that preferves it from 
being impofed on, and difpofes it to examine with 
that indifferency, till it has done its be-ft to find 
the truth ; and this is the only direct and fafe 
way to it. But to be indifferent whether we em- 
brace falfiiood or truth or no, is the great road to 

error. Thofe who are not indifferent which 

opinion is true, are guilty of this •, they fuppofe, 
without examining, that what they hold is true, 
and then think they ought to be zealous for it. 
Thofe, it is plain by their warmth and eagernefs, 
are not indifferent for their own opinions, but 
methkiks are very indifferent whether they be 
true or falfe, fmce they cannot endure to have 
any doubts railed, or objections made againft 
them ; and it is vifible they never have made 
any themfelves, and i'o never having examined 
them, know not, nor are concerned, as they 
fhould be, to know whether they be true or 
falfe. 

Thefe are the common and mod general mis- 
carriages, which I think men fhould avoid or 
rectify in a right conduct of their understandings, 
andfliould be particularly taken care of in educa- 



T WE V N D E R 3 T A N D I N G. 37 

EXAMINE. 

tion. The bufinefs whereof in refpect of know- 
ledge, is not, as I think, to perfect a learner in 
all or any one of the fciences ; but to give his 
mind that freedom, that difpoiition, and thofe 
habits that may enable him to attain any part of 
knowledge he mall apply himfelf to, or Hand in 
need of in the future courf^ of his life. 

This, and this only, is well principling, and 
not the inftilling a reverence and veneration for 
certain dogmas under the fpecious title of prin- 
ciples, which are often fo remote from that truth 
and evidence which belongs to principles, that 
they ought to be rejected as falfe and erroneous, 
and is often the caufe, to men fo educated, when 
they come abroad into the world, and find they 
cannot maintain the principles, fo taken up and 
refted in, to caft off all principles, and turn per- 
fect fceptics, regardlefs of knowledge and virtue. 

There are feveral weaknefles and defects in the 
under/landing, either from the natural temper of 
the mind, or ill habits taken up, which hinder 
it in its progrefs to knowledge. Of thefe there 
are as many poilibly to be found, if the mind 
were thoroughly ftudied, as there are difeafes of 
ihe body, each whereof clogs and di fables the 
underftanding to fome degree, and therefore de- 
ierves to be looked after and cured. I mall fet 
down fome few to excite men, efpecially thofe 
who make knowledge their bullnefs, to look into 
ifelves, and obferve whether they do not in- 
dulge fome weaknefs, allow fome mifcarriages in 
the management of their intellectual faculty, 
which is prejudicial to them in the fearch of 
th. 

E 



3 g TH E C ONDUCT F 



SECTION XIII, 



OBSERVATION'. 

Particular matters efface are the undoubted 
foundations on which our civil and natural know- 
ledge is built : the benefit the understanding 
makes of them is to draw from them ccnclufions, 
which may be as (landing rules of knowledge, 
and confequently ci practice. The mind often 
makes not that benefit it fhould of the informa- 
tion it receives from the accounts of civil or natu- 
ral hiitorians, in being too forward) or too flow 
in making observations on the particular facls re- 
corded in them. 

There are thofe who are very aiTiduous in read- 
ing, and yet do not much advance their know- 
ledge by it. They are delighted with the (tones 
that are tcld, and perhaps can tell them again, 
tor they make all they rend nothing but hiftory 
to themfelves *, but not retl >n it, not mak- 

ing to themfelves obfc-i vations from what they 
rend, they are very little improved hy all that 
crowd of particulars that either pafs through, or 
lodge themfelves in their underftandings. They 
dream on in a bonftant ccurfe of reading and 
cramming themfelves, but net digefting any thing, 
it produces nothing but an heap of crudities. 

If their memories retain well, one may hry 
they have the materials of knowledge ; but like 



T K E C R 5 T A N DING. 39 

OBSERVATION. 

thofe for building, they arc of no advantage, if 

there be no other ufe made or them but to let 
them lie heaped up together. Oppofite to thefe 
there are others who lofe the improvement they 
fhould make of matters of fact by a quite contrary 
conduct. They are apt to draw general eonclu- 
fionSj and rake axioms from every particular 
they meet with. Thefe make as little true bene- 
fit of hiftory as the ether, n .y, ! : forward 
and active fpirits, receive more harm by it ; it 
being of worfe confequence to fteer one's thoughts 
by a wrong rule, than to have none at all*, error 
doing to bufy men much more, harm, than igno- 
rance to the flow and fluggifh. Between thefe, 
thofe feem to do beft, who taking material and 
ufeful hints, fomethr.es from (Ingle matters of 
fact, carry them in their minds to be judged of 
by what they (hall find in hiftory, to confirm or 
reverfe thefe imperfect ; which 
be eflabiifhed into rules fit to be relied on, when 
they are juftified by a fufiicient and war 
tion of particulars. He that makes no i"uch re- 
flections on what he r ^ads his mind 
With a rhapfody of tales fit in winter nights for the 
entertainment of others ; nod he that will 
prove every matter of fact into a maxim, will 
•.J in contrary obferv dons, that can I 

ufc but to pei odder him, it 

he compares them ; or die to mkgokle him, if 
he gives himfelf up to the authority of that, ■ 
for its novelty, or for I . beft plea- 






. T I ■ - 

I 5. 

- i 

ruth 
pure . •■■ ". bear oc - 
t. II wbli 

g itlelf 
it is in itfclf, i 

tliouj it not I :hmi 

■.:;; 
right l 

;. No bodv i I be at fi 

• . •• : commc 

: . . 

- 
■ 

E EC I - 

f have to c 

t il 
. i : : . 
ty : for 

■ 
■ 
t men I » or mifafc 



:: G. 

- 

s not 

- 
i:as not.. 



si 

. s good Q . idc 

- 

: 
. 
power, p: credit, 

s to fnpf ; 
is of no 

I 

- 

- 
I 



42 the conduct of 

arguments. 
gathered from other men's thoughts, floating only 
in the memory, are there ready indeed to fuppiy 
copious talk with fame appearance of reafon, but 
are far from helping us to judge right. Such va- 
riety of arguments only diffract the underftand- 
ing that relies on them, unlefs it has gone farther 
than fuch fuperficial way of examining ; this is to 
quit truth for appearance, only to ferve our va- 
nity. The fure and only way to get true know- 
ledge, is to form in our minds clear fettled noti- 
ons of things, with names annexed to thofe de- 
termined ideas. Thefe we are to confider, and 
with their feveral relations and habitudes, and 
not amufe ourfelves with floating names, and words 
of indetermined iignification, which we can ufe in 
feveral fenfes to ferve a turn. It is in the per- 
ception of the habitudes and refpecls our ideas 
have one to another, that real knowledge con- 
lifts ; and when a man once perceives how far 
they agree or difagree one with another, he will 
be able to judge of what other people fay, and 
will not need to be led by the arguments of others, 
which'are many of them nothing but plaufible fo- 
phiftry. This will teach him to ftate the queftbn 
right, and fee v, hereon it turns ; and thus he will 
fiand upon his own legs, and know by his own 
understanding. .Whereas by collecting and learn- 
ing arguments by heart, he will be but a retainer 
to others ; and when any one queftions the foun- 
dations they are built upon, he will be at a non- 
plus, and be fain to give up his implicit know- 
ledge. 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 43 

SECTION XV. 
HASTE. 

i Labour for labour' fake is againft nature. The- 
underftanding, as well as the other faculties, 
choofes always the fhoi teft way to its end, would 
prefently obtain the knowledge it is about, and 
then fet upon fome new inquiry. But this, whe- 
ther lazinefs or hafte ; often mifleads it, and makes 
it content itfelf with improper ways of fearch, and 
fuch as will not ferve the turn. Sometimes it reft3 
upon teftimony, when teftimony of right has no- 
thing to do, becaufe it is eafier to believe than t© 
be fcientifically inftructed. Sometimes it contents 
itfelf with one argument, and refts fatisfied with 
that, as it were a demonstration •, whereas the 
thing under proof is not capable of demonstra- 
tion, and therefore rhuft be iubmitted to the trial 
of probabilities, and all the material arguments 
pro and con be examined and brought to a ba- 
lance. In fome cafes the mind is determined by 
probable topics in inquiries, where demonstration 
may be had. All thefe, and feveral others, which 
lazinefs, impatience, cuftom, and want of ufe and 
attention lead them into, are mifapplications of the 
underftanding in the fearch of truth. In every 
queftion, the nature and manner of the proof it 
is capable of, fhould firft be considered to make 
our inquiry fuch as it fhould be. This would 
fave a great deal of frequently mifcmployed pains, 
and lead us fooner to that difcovery and pofleffion 
of truth we are capable of. The multiplying va- 
riety of arguments, efpecially frivolous ones, fuch 



44 THE CONDUCT Or 

DESULTORY. 

as are all that are merely verbal, is not only loft 
labour, but cumbers the memory to no purpofe, 
and fervesonly to hinder it from feizing and hold- 
ing of the truth in all thofe c.'.f.s which are capa- 
ble of demonftration. In fuch a way of proof 
the truth and certainty is feen, and the mind fully 
pofTefies itfelf of it; when in the other way of 
affent, it only hovers about it, is a am fed with un- 
certainties. In this fuperficial way, indeed, the 
mind is capable of more variety of plauiible talk, 
but is not enlarged as it mould be in its know- 
ledge. It is to this fame hafte and impatience of 
the mind alfo, that a not due tracing of the argu- 
ments to their true foundation is owing ; men fee 
a little, prefume a great deal, and {o jump to the 
conclufion. This is a fhort way to fancy and con- 
ceit, and (if firmly embraced) to opiniatrety, but 
is certainly the fartheft way about to knowledge. 
For he that will know, mult by the connection of 
the proofs fee the truth, and the ground it ftands 
on ; and therefore, if he has for hafte fkipt over 
what he mould have examined, he muit begin and 
go over all again, or elfe he will never come to; 
knowledge. 



section xvi; 



DESULTORY. 



Another fault of as ill confequence as this, 
which proceeds alfo from lazinefs with a mixture 
of vanity, is the {kipping from one fort of know- 
ledge to another. Some men's tempers are quickly 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 4$ 

UNIVERSALITY. 

weary of any one thing. Conftancy and affiduity 
is what they cannot bear : the fame ftudy long con- 
tinued in, is as intolerable to them, as the appear- 
ing long in the fame clothes or falhion is to a 
court lady. 

SECTION XVII. 
SMATTERING. 

Others, that they may feem univerfally know- 
ing, get a little {"mattering in every thing. Both 
thefe may fill their heads with fuperficiai notions 
of things, but are very much out of the way of 
attaining truth or knowledge. 

SECTION XVIII. 
UNIVERSALITY. 

I do not here (peak again ft the taking a tafte cf 
every fort of knowledge : it is certainly very ufe- 
ful and necefrary to form the mind, but then it 
muft be done in a different way, and to a different 
:-n3. Not for talk and vanity to fill the head with 
.• of all kinds, that he who is pofTeilcd of 
fuch a frippery, may be able to match the dif- 
ccurfes of all he fhall meet with, as if nothing 
j come amifs to him ; and his head was fo well 
itored a magazine, that nothing could be propo- 
fed which he was not matter of, and was readily 
furniflied to entertain any one on. This is an 
excellency indeed, and a great one too, to have a 
real and true knowledge in all or mod of the ob- 
jects of contemplation. But it is what the mind 



Sfi THE CONDUCT OF 

UNIVERSALITY. 

of one and the fame man can hardly attain unto; 
and the inftances are fo few of thofe who have in 
any meafure approached towards it, that I know 
not whether they are to be propofed as examples 
in the ordinary conduct of the underftanding. 
For a man to underftand fully the bufinefs of his 
particular calling in the commonwealth, and of 
religion, which is his calling as he is a man in the 
world, is ufually enough to take up his whole time *, 
and there are few that inform themfclves in thefe, 
which is every man's proper and peculiar bufinefs, 
{q to the bottom as they fhould do. But though 
this be Co, and there are very few men that ex- 
tend their thoughts towards univerfal knowledge ; 
yet I do not doubt but if the right way were ta- 
ken, and the methods of enquiry were ordered as 
they fhould be, men of little bufinefs and great 
leifure might go a great deal farther in it than is 
ufually done. To return to the bufinefs in hand, 
the end and ufe of a little infight in thofe parts of 
knowledge which are not a man's proper bufi 
is to accuftom our minds to all forts of ideas, and 
the proper ways of examining their habitudes and 
relations. This gives the mind a freedom, and 
the exercifmg the under/landing in the feveral 
ways of enquiry and reasoning which the mo ft 
il have made ufe of, teaches the mind figncity 
and warinefs, and a fr.pplenefs to apply itfclf more 
cioieiy and dexteroully to the bents rmd turns of 
the matter in all irs researches. Befides this uni- 
verfal cafte of all the feiences, with an in., 
ency before the mind is poiMcd with any one 
in particular, and grown into love and admiration 
of what is made its darling, will prevent another 
evil very commonly to be obferved in thofe who 
have from the beginning been feafoned only by 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 47 

UNIVERSALITY. 

one part of knowledge. Let a man be given up 
to the contemplation of one fort of knowledge, 
and that will become every thing. The mind will 
take fuch a tincture from a familiarity with that 
object, that every thing elfe, how remote foever, 
will be brought under the fame view. A meta- 
phylician will bring plowing and gardening imme- 
diately to abftract. notions, the hiitory of nature 
(hall fignify nothing to him. An alchymift, on 
the contrary, mall reduce divinity to the maxims 
of his laboratory, explain morality by Sa/, Sulphur, 
and Mercury, and allegorize the fcripture itftlf, 
and the facred myfteries thereof, into the philofo- 
pher's ftone. And I heard once a man, who had 
a more than ordinary excellency in mufic, feri- 
oufly accommodate Mcfes" feven days of the firfr. 
-week to the notes of mufic, as if from thence had 
been taken the meafure and method of the crea- 
tion. It is of no fmall confequence to keep the 
mind from fuch a pcfleffion, which I think is bed 
done by giving it a fair and equal view of the 
whole intellectual world, wherein it may fee the 
order, rank, and beauty of the whole, and give 
a juft allowance to the diftindt provinces of the 
feveral fciences in the due order and ufcfulnefs of 
each of them. 

If this be that which old men will not think 
neceffary, nor be eafily brought to ; it is fit at 
lean: that it mould be practifed in the breeding of 
the young. The bufinefs of education, as I have 
already obferved, is not, as I think, ro make them 
perfect in any one of the fciences, but fo to open 
and difpofe their minds as may beft make them 
capable of any, when they fhall apply themfelves 
to it. If men are for a long time accuftomed only 



45 THE CONDUCT OF 

READING. 

to one fort or method of thoughts, their minds 
grow ftiff in it, and do not readily turn to ano- 
ther. It is therefore to give them this freedom, 
that I think they mould be made to look into all 
forts of knowledge, and exercife their underhand- 
ings in fo wide a variety and flock of knowledge. 
But I do not propofe it as a variety and ftock of 
knowledge, but a variety and freedom of think- 
ing, as an increafc of the powers and activity of 
the mind, not as an enlargement of its poiTeffions-. 

SECTION XIX. 
READING. 

This is that which I think great readers are apt 
to be miftaken in. Thofe who have read of eve- 
ry thing, are thought to underftand every thing 
too; but it is not always fo. Reading furnifhes 
the mind only with materials of knowledge, it is 
thinking makes what we read our's. We are of 
the ruminating kind, and it is not enough to cram 
ourfelves with a great load of collections ; unlefs 
we chew them over again, they will not give us 
ftrength and nourishment. There are indeed in 
fome writers viiible inftances of deep thoughts, 
clofe and acute reafoning, and ideas well purfued. 
The light thefe would give, would be of great ufe, 
if their readers would obferve and imitate them; 
all the reil: at beft are but particulars fit to be 
turned into knowledge ; but that can be done 
only by our own meditation, and examining the 
reach, force and coherence of -what is faid ; and 
then as far as we apprehend and fee the connec- 
tion of ideas, fo far it is our 'a ; without that it is 



THE U N D E R S T A N D 1 N G. 49 

EADING. 

but io much Idofe matter floating in our brain. 
The memory may be ftored, but the judgment is 
little better, and the ftock of knowledge not in- 
creafed by being able to repeat hers have 

iaid, or produce the arguments we have found in 
them. Such a knowledge as this, is bur know- 
ledge by hearfay, and the oftentation of it is at 
belt but talking by rote, and very often up- 
on weak and wrong prii For all that is to 
be found in books is not built upon true founda- 
tions, nor ah- htly deduced fi prin- 
ciples it is pretended to be built en. Such 211 ex- 
amen as is requiiite to difcover read* 
mind is not forward to make j efpecially in 
thofe who have given themfelves up to a party, and 

• -- . 
may favour and fupport the tenets of it. Such 

wilfully exclude theml trut , and 

from all true benefit to be received by 
Other : attention 

elf to, 
be at is to trace 

1 to fee upon what 

firmly •, but yet it is this that gives fo much 
ihe advantage to one man more than anothei 
. Id, by fevere rules, 

tied J own to this at Mr it an ; u e and ex* 

it facility. So that thofe who are 
nccuftomed to it, r is it were with one caft 

of the eye, rew of the argument, and - 

y, in moft cafes, fee where it bottoms. T 

who have got this faculty, one may fay, have got 

the true key of bock.-, and the clue to lead them 

through tl - of opinion; 

" F 



itfelf to, 

:nt to its ori-J 

and( 



<0 THE CONDUCT OF 

READING. 

rs to truth and certainty. This young 

ginners fliould be entered in, and fhewed the ufe 

at they might profit by their reading. Thofe 

are Grangers to it, will be apt to think it too 

great a clog in the way of men's ftudies, and they 

will fufpect they {hall make but fmali progrefs, if, 

in the books they read, they muft ftand to exa- 

. and unravel every argument, and follow it 

... by ftep up to its original. 

I anfwer, this is a good objection, and o 
to weigh with thofe whole reading is defigned fee 
: and little knowledge; and I have no- 
thing to lay to it. But I am here inquiring 
the conduct of the underfcanding in its progrefs 
rds knowledge : and to thole who aim at that^) 
I may hy, that he who fair and foftly goes itea- 
forward in a courfe that points right, will 
_r beat his journey's end, than he that runs 
ry one he meets, though he gallop all 

To which let me add, .that this way of think- 
ing on, and profiting by what we read, will 

and rub to any one only in the beginning; 
,>:eiciie has mane it familiar, it 
lied in m , without red- 

or interruption in the courie or" cur rea 
motions and- views of a mind exercifed that 
. are wonderfully quick •, and a man ufed to 
fuch fort of reflections, lees as much at one 
glimpfe as would require a long difcourfe to lay 
before another, and make cut in an entire and gra- 
dual deduction. Befides, that when the fir ft . 
culties are over* the delight and fenfible advantage 



T 1 1 B U N D E R £ T A N D I N G . 5 I 

INTERMEDIATE PR IN C IT L ES. 

it brings mightily encourages and enlivens the 
mini! in reading, which without this is very un- 
called ftudy. 



SECTION XX. 
INTERMEDIATE PRIKCiP: 

As an hein to this, I think it may be propofed, 
that for the faving the long progreffion of 
thoughts to remote and firft principles in every 
eafe, the mind Hiould provide itfelf feveral 
ges, that is to fay, intermediate principles, which 
it might have recourfe to in the examini 
portions that come in its way. Thefe, th 
i.ot Pelf-evident principles, yet if I 
been made out from them by a wary and ur. 
tionabl. deduction depended en as certain 

and infallible truths, and 
truths to prove other points lU 

nearer and flidrter view than r 

may fervj rks to 

fliew what lies in the direct way of truth, or is 
quite belides it. lathematici 

who w problem run it back to 

t-lie . ugh all the whole train oi: 

intermediate proportion?. Certain theorem; 

have fettled to themfelves upc;; 'lire demen- 
ferve to refolve to them 1 "3 of 

proportions whicl 
tirmlj out from thence, as it t] 

F 2 



52 THE ,C N DUCT F 

PARTIALITT. 

that tics them to firfi: fdf-evident principles. Oa- 

ly in other fciences great care is to' be taken that 

they eftablilh thofe intermediate principles, with 

as much caution, exactness and indifferency, as 

mathematicians ufe in the fettling any of their 

great theorems. When this is not done, but men 

take up the principles in this cr that fcienee upon 

credit, inclination, intereft, &c. in, hafte without 

sxamination, and mo ft unqueftionable proof, 

they lay a trap for thefui elves, and as much as in. 

e ;aptivate their understandings to mif 

. . . rror. 



SECTION XXI. 
PARTIALITY, 



As there is a partiality to opinions, which, as 
we have already obferved, is apt to miflead iheun- 
derftanding j fo there is often a partiality to flu- 
dies, which is prejudicial alfo to knowledge and 
improvement. Thofe fciences which men are par- 
ticularly verfed in, they are apt to value and ex- 
tol, as if that part of knowledge which every one 
has acquainted himjeif with, were that alone 
which was worth the having, and all the reft were 
idle, and empty amufements, comparatively of no 
ufe or importance. This is the effect of igno- 
rance and not knowledge, the being vainly puffed 
up with a flatulency, arifing from a weak and nar- 
row compreherifiori. It is not amifs that every 
one.fhould rtliQi the feience that he has mad< . 
... .\k!v ; a view oi : its beauties, and a fenfe 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 53 

THEOLOGY. 

of its ufefulnefs, carries a man on with the 
more delight and warmth in the purfuit and 
improvement of it. But the contempt of all 
other knowledge, as if it were nothing in com- 
parifon of law or phytic, of aftronomy or chy- 
miftry, or perhaps ibme yet meaner part of 
knowledge, wherein I have got fome {'matter- 
ing, or am fomewhat advanced, is not only the 
mark of a vain or little mind, but does this 
prejudice in the conduct of the underftanding, 
that it coops it up within narrow bounds, and 
hinders it from looking abroad into other provin- 
ces of the intellectual world, more beautiful pof- 
fibiy, and more fruitful, than that which it had till 
then laboured in ; wherein it might find, befides 
new knowledge, ways or hints whereby it might 
3 the better to cultivate its own. 



SECTION XXII. 
THEOLOGY. 

There is indeed one fcience (as they are now 

nguifhed) incomparably above all the reft, 

e it is not by corruption narrowed into a 

. or faction, for mean or ill ends, and fecular 

intercfts ; I mean theology, which containing the 

knowledge of God and his creatures, our duty to 

him and our fallow creatures, and a view of our 

prefent and future f L ate, is the comprehenfibn of all 

other knowledge directed to its true end ; i. e. the 

honour and veneration of the Creator, and the 

happinefs of mankind. This is that noble ftudv 

F 3 



54 T H E C N D U C 1 I 

P A R T IAL1TY. 

which is every man's duty, and every one 
cm be called a rational creature is capable of. 
The works of nature, and the words of revelation, 
difplay it to mankind in characters fo large and 
vifible, that thofe who are not quite blind may in 
them read, and fee the 6rft principles and moft 
neceflary parts of it ; and from thence, as they 
have time and indufiry, may be enabled to goon 
to the more abftrufe parts of it, and penetrate 
into thofe infinite depths filled with the treafures 
of wifdom and knowledge. This is that fcience, 
which would truly enlarge men's minds, were it 
ftudied, or permitted to be ftudied every where 
with that freedom, love of truth, and charity 
which it teaches, and were not made, contrary to 
its nature, the occafion of it rife, faction, malig- 
nity, and narrow impofitions. I mail fay no 
more here of this, but that it is undoubtedly a 
wrong ufe of my underftanding, to make it the 
rule and meafure of another man's •, a ufe which 
it is neither fit for i;or capable cf. 



SECTION XXIII, 
PARTIALITY. 



This partiality, where ij is not permitted an 
authority to render all other itudies infigniflcant 
or contemptible, is often indulged fo far as to be 
relied upon, and made ufe of in other parts of 
knowledge, to which it does not at all belong, and 
wherewith it has no manner of affinity. Some 
men have »o ufed their heads to mathematical 



"THE UNDERSTANDING. $$ 

PARTIALITY. 

figures, that giving a preference to the methods 
of that fcience, they introduce lines and diagrams 
into their ftudy of divinity, or politic enquiries, 
as if nothing could be known without them; and 
others accuftomed to retired Speculations, run na- 
tural philofophy into metaphyseal notions, and 
the abirract generalities of logic ; and how often 
may one meet with religion and morality treated of 
in the terms of the laboratory, and thought to be 
improved by the methods and notions of chymif- 
try ! But he that will take care of the conduct 
of his understanding, to direct it right to the 
knowledge o: things, muft avoid thofe undue 
mixtures, and not by a fondnefs for what he has 
found ufeful and nectiTary in one, transfer it to 
another fcience, where it ferves only to perplex 
and confound the understanding, It is a certain 
truth, that res holunt male adminiftrari, it is no 
lefs certain, res nolunt ina'e inielligi. Things 
themlelvcs are to be ccnfldered as they are in 
themfelves, and then they will mew us in what 
way they are to be underftood. For to have right 
conceptions about them, we muft bring our un- 
derstandings to the inflexible natures, and unal- 
terable relations of things, and net endeavour to 
bring things to any preconceived notions of our 
own. 

There is another partiality very commonly ob- 
fervable in men of ftudy, no lels prejudicial nor 
ridiculous than the former ; and that is a fantasti- 
cal and wild attributing all knowledge to the anci- 
ents alone, or to the moderns. This raving upon 
antiquity in matter of poetry, Horace has wittily 
defcribed and expofed in one of his fatyrs. The 



$6 THE CONDUCT OF 

PARTIALITY. 

fame fort of madnefs may be found in reference 
to all the other fciences. Seme will not admit an 
opinion not authorized by men of old, who were 
then all giants in knowledge. Nothing is to be 
put into the treafory of truth or knowledge, which 
has not the itamp of Greece cr Rome upon it ; and 
fince their days will fcarce allow that men have 
been able to fee, think or write. Others with a like 
extravagancy, contemn all that the an cientshave 
left us, and being taken with the modern inven- 
tions and difcoveries, lay by all that went before, 
as if whatever is called old anuft have the decay 
of time upon it, and truth too were liable to mould 
and rottennefs. Men, I think, have been much 
the fame for natural endowments in all ticnes, 
Fafhion, difcipline, and education, have put emi- 
nent differences in the ages of feveral countries, 
and made one generation much differ from ano- 
ther in arts and fciences : but truth is always the 
fame •, time alters it not, nor is it the better or 
worfe for being of ancient cr modern tradition. 
Many were eminent in former ages of the world 
for. COvery and delivery of it; but though 

the knowledge they have left us be worth our ftu- 
dy, yet the) exhausted not all' its treafure ; they 
left a great deal for the induitry and fagacity of 
after ages, and fo fhall we. That was once new 
to them which any one now receives with venera- 
tion for its antiquity ; nor was it the worie for ap- 
pearing as a novelty ; and that which is now em- 
braced for its n^vnefs, will, to pofterity, be old, 
but not thereby be lefs true or lefs genuine. 
| There is no occasion on this account to oppofe 
j the ancients and the moderns to one another, or 
J to be fqucamhh on either fide. [He that wifely 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 57 

PARTIALITY. 

conducts his mind in the purfuit of knowledge, 
will gather what lights, and get what helps he cap] 

from either of them, from whom they are beft tp '* 

be had, without adoring the errors, or rejecting 

] the truth he oaay rind mingled in them. ^J 

Another partiality maybe obferved, in fome to 
ir, in others to heterodox tenets : fome are apt 
to conclude, that what is the common opinion can- 
not but be true •, fo many men's eyes they think can- 
not but fee right ; fo many men's underltandings of 
aii forts cannot be deceived, and therefore will not 
venture to look beyond the received notions of 
the place and age, nor have fo prefumptuous a 
thought as to be wifer than their neighbours. 
They are content to go with the croud, and fo 
go eafily, which they think is going right or at 
ieaft fcrves them as well. But however, vox po- 
fuli vox Dc t has prevailed as a maxim, yet I 
do not remember where ever God delivered his 
orae'es by the multitude, or nature truths by the 
herd. On the other fide, fome fly ail common 
opinions as either falfe or frivcicus. The title of 
manyheaded beaft is a fuflicient reafon to them to 
conclude, that no truths of weight or confequence 
c.-.r. be lodged there. Vulgar opinions are fuittd 
to vulgar capacities, and adapted to the ends of 
thofe that govern. He that will know the truthk 
of things, muf: leave the common and beaten; 
track, which none but weak and fervile minds, 
are f.itisried to trudgealong continually in. Such 
nice palates relifli nothing but ft range notions 
quite out of the w. te'ver is commonly re- 

ceived, has the mark o: the beaft on it 5 and they 

:<.n to it, or 



cS THE CONDicf OF 

PARTIALITY. 

runs only after paradox 

./:,-... ibi ace, thefe alone 

lem- 
- from the vulgar. But con .cm- 

".re not :. 

xefore fhc 
us in ' fh ... I not judge of/ 

things by mei opinions 

: . The; e reafon but ill, and there- 

fore n and cannot be relied 

en, :. J be followed as a fure guide : but 

fophers who ': tted the orthodox] 

the cos _ -.lines eft' 

tries, have fallen into as t s 

ever common re: . - 

:ed. It would be madnefs to refufe to 
ir, or quench one's thirft 
with water, becaufe the rabt hefe 

purpofes ; and if there are conveniences of life 
h common u(e reaches not, it is not i 
: them, becaufe they are not grown intc 
ary fafhion of the country, and 

Tn • ther in or out of fafhion, is the 

id the bu fine's of 
underftanding ; wl how- 

ever autl 

thing 

;r fort cf p: 

; : make tl 
ng little uieful to then 
ufe of the 

ing fcrefs upon their authorities, where-..; 

: their own opinions. 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 59 

PARTIALITY. 

There is nothing almoft has done more harm 
to men dedicated to letters, than giving the name 
or ftudy to reading, and making a man of great 
reading to be the lame with a man of great know- 
ledge, or at leaft to be a title of honour. AH 
that can be recorded in writing are only facts or 
reaibnings. Facts are of three Jorts : 

1. Merely of natural agents, obfervable in the 

ordinary operations of bodies one upon another, 
whether in the viable courfe of things left to 
themielves, or in experiments made by men, ap- 
plying agents and patients to one another, after a 
peculiar and artificial manner. 

2. Of voluntary agents, more efpecially the 
-actions "of men in fociety, which makes civil and 
moral hiftory. 

3. Of opinions. 

In thefe three confiib, as it feems to me, that" 
■which commonly has the name of learning •, to 
which perhaps fome may add a diftinct head of 
critical writings, which indeed at bottom is no- 
thing but matter of fact, and refolyes itfclf into 
this, that fuch a man, or let of men, ufed fuch 
a word or phrafe in fuch a fenfe, i. c. that they 
made fuch founds the marks of fuch ideas. 

Under reafonings I comprehend all the disco- 
veries of general truths made by human reafon, 
whether found by intuition, demonstration, or 
probable deductions. And this is that which is, 
u not alone knowledge, (becaufe the truth or 



#5 "THK CO H D U C 1 O ? 

PARTIALITY. 

probability of particular proportions may be 
known too) yet is, as may be fuppofed, mod pra- 
perly the bufinefs of thofe who pretend to im- 
prove their underftandings, and make themfelves 
knowing by reading. 

Books and reading are looked upon to be the 
great helps of the under/landing, and inftruments 
of knowledge, as it mull be allowed that they are ; 
and yet I beg leave leave to queftion whether thefe 
do not prove an hindrance to many and keep 
fever^l bookifh men from attaining to folid 
and true knowledge. This, I think, I may be 
permitted to fay, that there is no part wherein the 
underftanding needs a more careful and wary 
conduct, than in the life of books *, without 
which they will prove rather innocent amufements 
than profitable employments of our time, and 
bring but (mail additions to our knowledge. 

There is not fcldom to be found even amongft 
thofe who aim at knowledge, who 4 with an un- 
wearied induftry, employ their whole time in 
books, who fcarce allow themfelves time to eat 
or fleep, but read, and read, and read on, but 
yet make no great advances in real knowledge, 
though there be no defect in their intellectual fa- 
culties, to which their little progrefs can be impu- 
The miftake here is, that it is ufually fup- 
pofed, that by reading, the author's knowledge is 
transfufed into the reader's underllanding •, and fo- 
il is, but not by bare reading but by reading and 
understanding what he writ. Whereby I mean, 
not barely comprehending what is affirmed or 
denied in each proportion (though that great 



T H E UNDERSTANDING. 6 1 

PARTIAL! •: 

readers do not always think themfelves concerned 
precifely to do) but to fee and follow the train or" his 
rea(bnings,obiervetheftrengthandclearnefsofthtic 

connection, and examine upon what they bottom. 
Without this a man may read the difcourfes of a 
very rational author, writ in a language and in 
proportions that he very well understands, and 
yet acquire not one jot of his knowledge ; which 
confiding only in the perceived, certain, or probable 
connection of the ideas made ufe of in hisreafon- 
ingSjthe reader's knowledge is no farther increafed, 
than he perceives, thaffo much ss he fees of this 
connection, fo much he knows of the truth or pro- 
bability of that author's opinions. 

All that he relies on without this perception, 
he takes upon truft upon the authors credit, with- 
out any knowledge of it at all. This makes me not 
nt all wonder to fee fome men fo abound in cita- 
tions, and build fo much upon authorities, it be- 
ing the fole foundation on which they bottom 
molt of their own tenets ; fo that in effect they 
but a fecond hand or implicit knowledge, i. e. 
are in the right, if inch an one from whom they 
borrowed it, were in the right in that opinion 
which they took from him, which in !eed is no 
knowledge at all. Writers of this cr former ages 
may be good witnefles of matters of fact, which. 
we may do well to take upon their authority ; but 
their credit can go no farther than this, it cannot 
at all affect the truth and falfhood of opinions, 
which have no other fort of trial but reafon and 
proof, which they themfelves made ufti of to 
themfelves knowing, and fo mud others too 
G 



#2 THE CONDUCT OF 

PARTIALITY. 

that will partake in their knowledge. Indeed it 
is an advantage that they have been at the pains 
to find out the proofs, and lay them in that order 
that may {hew the truth or probability of their 
conclusions; and for this we owe them great ac- 
knowledgments, for favingus the pains in fearch- 
ing out thofe proofs which they have collected for 
us, and which poffibly, afrer all our pains, we 
might not have found, nor been able to have fet 
them in fo good a light as that which they left 
them us in. Upon this account we are mightily be- 
holding to judicious writers of all ages for thofe 
difcoveries and difcourfes they have left behind 
them for our inftruclion, if we know how to 
make a right ufe of them ; which is, not to run 
them over in an hafty perufal, and perhaps lodge 
their opinions, or fome remarkable paflages in our 
memories, but to enter into their reafonings, ex- 
amine their proofs, and then judge of the truth 
or falfhood, probability or improbability of what 
they advance ; not by any opinion we have en- 
tertained of the author, but by the evidence he 
produces, and the conviction he affords U3, drawn . 
from things themfelves. Knowing is feeing, ancT; 
if it be fo, it is madnefs to perfuade oiirfelves that ! 
we do fo by another man's eyes, let him ufe ever; 
fo many words to tell us, that what lie afTerts is ■ 
very vifible. Till we ourjelves fee it with cur own I 
eyes, and perceive it by our own underflandings, | 
we are as much in the dark, and as void of know- 
ledge as before, let us believe any learned author 
as much as we will. 

Euclid and Archimedes are allowed to be know- 
ing, and to have demonftrated what they fay; 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 6*3 

HASTE. 

and yet whoever fhall read over their writings with- 
out perceiving the connection of their proofs, and 
feeing what they (hew, though he may under- 
hand all their words, yet he is not the more 
knowing : he may believe indeed, but does not 
know what they fay, and Co is not advanced one 
jot in mathematical knowledge by all his reading 
of thefe approved mathematicians. 



section xxiv, 



HASTE. 

The eagernefs and (crong bent of" the mind af- 
ter knowledge, if not warily regulated, is often 
an hindrance to it. It ftill prdTes into farther 
difcoveries and new objects, and catches at the va- 
riety of knowledge, and therefore often itays not 
long enough on what is before it, to look into it 
as it mould for halre, to purfue what is yet out 
of fight. He that rides poft through a country, 
may be able from the tranMent view, to teii how 
in general the pares lie, and may be able to give 
feme loofe description of here a mountain, and 
thtre a plain, here a morafs, and there a 1 
woodland in one part, and favannas in another. 
Such fuperficiai" ideas and obfervations as thefe he 
may collect in galloping over it. But the more 
ufeful obfervations of the foil, plants, animals, and 
inhabitants, with their fcvtral forts ancj proper- 
ties, oiuft nccciiarily efcape him ; and it is feldom 
men ever diicover the rich mines, without fome- 
G z 



64 T HE CO N D U C T C L 

HASTE. 

digging. Nature commoi ; . her treafure 

and jewels in rocky ground. It the matter be 

knotty, and the fenfe lies deep, the mind muft 
ftop and buckle to it, and ftick upon it with la- 
bour and thought, and clofe contemplation, and 
not leave it till it has mattered the difficulty, and< 
got pofleflion of truth. But here cart muft be taken 
to avoid the other extreme : a man muft net ftick 
at every ufelefs .nicety, and expect myfteries of 
fcience in every trivial queftion or fcruple that he 
may raife. He that will (land to pick up and ex- 
amine every pebble that comes in his way, is as 
Icely to return enriched and leaden with jew- 
els, as the other that travelled full fpeed. Truths 
are net the better nor the worfe for their obvicuf-. 
nefs or difficulty, but their value is to be meafured 
by their ufefulnefs and tendency. Infignincant 
obfervations fhould not take up any of our mi- 
nutes, and thofe that enlarge our view, and give 
light towards farther and ufeful difcoveries, fhould 
not be neglected, though they Hop our courfe, 
and fpend iome of cur time in a fixed attention. 

There is another hafte that does often, and will 
miflead the mind if it be left to itfelf, and its 
own conduct. The underftanding is naturally 
forward, not only to learn its know! 
cty, (which makes it flap over one to get fpei 
to -another part of knowledge) but alfo eager t ) 
enlarge its views by running too faft into general 
obfervations and conclusions, without a due exa- 
mination of particulars enough whereon to I 
thofe general axioms. This feems to enlarge their 
ilock, but it is of fancies not realities ; fuch the- 
ories built upon narrow foundations ft.uid. but 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 65 

HASTE. 

weakly, and if they fall not of themfclves, are at 
leaft very hard to be iupported againftthe afTaults 
of oppofition. And thus men being too hafty to 
erect to themfclves general notions and ill ground- 
ed theories, find themfclves deceived in their flock 
of knowledge, when they come to examine their 
haftily alTumed maxims themfclves, or to have 
them attacked by others. General obfervations 
drawn from particulars are the jewels of know- 
ledge, comprehending great itore in a little room ; 
but they are therefore to be made with the greater 
care and caution ; left if we take counterfeit for 
true, our lofs and fhame be the greater when our 
frock comes to a fevere fcrutiny. One or two 
particulars may fuggeft hints of enquiry, and they 
do well to take thofe hints : but if they turn them, 
into conclulions, and make them prefently gene- 
ral rules, they are forward indeed, but it is only 
to impofe on themfclves by proportions alTumed. 
for truths, without fufficient warrant to make fuch 
obfervations, as has been already remarked, to 
make the head a magazine of materials which can 
hsrdly be called knowledge, or at leaft it is but 
like a collection o£ lumber not reduced to ufe or 
order ; and he that makes every thing an obfer- 
vation, has the fame ufelefs plenty, and much 
more falfhood mixed with it. The extremes on 
both fides are to be avoided, and he will be able to 
give the beft account of his ftudies who keeps his 
understanding in the right mean between them. 
G 3 



66 THE CONDUCT OF 



SECTION XXV. 
ANTICIPATION. 

Whether it be a love of that which brings the 
firft light and information to their minds, and 
want of vigour and induftry to enquire, or elfe 
that men content themfelves with any appearance 
of knowledge, right or wrong \ which when they 
have once got, they will hoM fa ft. This is vifible, 
that many men give themfelves up to the firft an- 
ticipations of their minds, and are very tenacious of 
the opinions that firftpoficfs them ; they are often 
as fond of their firft conceptions as of their firft 
born, and will by no means recede from the judg- 
ment they have once made, cr any conjecture or 
conceit which they have once entertained. This is 
a fault in the conduct of the underftanding, fince I 
this firmnefs, or rather ftiffhefs of them ind, is not 
from an adherence to truth, but a fubmiffipn to ) 
prejudice. It is an unreafonable homage paid to 
prepofTeflion, whereby we (hew a reverence not to 
(what we pretend to feek) truth ; but what by. 
hap-hazard we chance to light on, be it what it will. 
This is viiibly a prepoftercus ufe of our faculties, 
and is a downright prcftituting of the mind to 
refign it thus, and put it under the power of the 
firft comer. This cm never be allowed, or ought 
to be followed, as a right way to knowledge, till 
the underftanding (whole bufinefs it is to conform 
itfelf to what it finds on the objects without) can 
by its own opiniatrety change that, and make the 
unalterable nature of things comply with its own 
ha fry determinations, which will never be. "What- 
ever wc fancy, things keep their courfe *, and 
their habitudes, correfponclences, and relations, 
keep the fame to one another. 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 6*] 

SECTION XXVI. 
RESIGNATION. 

Contrary to thefe, but by a like dangerous ex- 
cefs on the other fide, are thofe who always 
refign their judgment to the laft man they heard 
or read. Truth never links into thefe men's 
minds, nor gives any tincture to them, but, came- 
lion like, they take the colour of what is laid be- 
fore them, and. as foon lofe and refign it to the 
next that happens to come in their way. The 
order wherein opinions are propoled or received 
by us is no rule of their rectitude, nor ought to 
be a caufe of their preference. Firft or laft, in 
this cafe, is the effect of chance, and not the 
meafure of truth or falfhood. This every one 
mutt confefs, and therefore fliould, in the pur- 
fuit of truth, keep his mind free from the influ- 
ence of any fuch accidents. A man may as rea- 
sonably draw cuts for his tenets, regulate his 
perfuafion by the caft of a die, as take it up for 
its novelty, or retam it beeaufe it had his firft 
affertt, and he was never of another mind. Well 
weighed reafons are to determine the judgment •, 
thole the mind flic .ys ready to hearken and 

fubmit to, and by their tdV.mony and fnffrage, en- 
tertain or reject airy tenet indifferently, whether 
it be a perfect Granger, or an old acquaintance. 



63 THE CONDUCT 01 

SECTION XXVII. 
PRACTICE. 

Though the faculties of the mind are improved 
by exercife, yet they muft not be put to a ftrefs 
beyond their ftrength. ghiid valeant humeri, quid 
ferre recv.Jent, muft be made the meafure of every 
one's underftanding, who has a defire not only to 
perform well, but to keep up the vigour of 
his faculties, and not to balk his underftand- 
ing by what is too hard for it. The mind by 
being engaged in a talk beyond its ftrength, like 
the body, ftrained by lifting at a weight too 
heavy, has often its force broken, and thereby gets 
an unaptnefs or an averfion to any vigorous at- 
tempt ever after. A finew cracked feldom reco- 
vers its former ftrength, or at leaft the tender- 
nefs of the fprain remains a good while after, and 
the memory of it longer, and leaves a lafting cau- 
tion in the man, not to put the part quickly again 
to any robuft employment. So it fares in the 
mind once jaded by an attempt above its power, 
it either is difabled for the future, or elfe checks 
at any vigorous undertaking ever after ; at leaft is 
very hardly brought to exert its force again on any 
fubject that requires thought and meditation. The 
underftanding fhould be brought to the difficult 
and knotty parts of knowledge, that try the 
ftrength of thought, and a full bent of the mind 
by infenfible degrees \ and in fuch a gradual pro- 
ceeding nothing is too hard for it. Nor let it be 
objected, that fuch a flow progrefs will never reach 
the extent of fome fciences. It is not to be ima- 
gined how far conftancy will carry a man ; how- 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 69 

PRACTICE. 

ever, it is better walking (lowly in a rugged way, 
than to break a leg, and be a cripple. He that 
begins with the calf may carry the ox •, but he that 
will at fir ft go to take up an ox may fo difable 
himfcif, as not to be able. to lift a calf after that. 
When the mind, by infenfible degrees, has brought 
itfelf to attention and clofe thinking, it will be 
to cope with difficulties, and matter them 
without any prejudice to itfelf; and then it may 
go on roundly. Every abftrufe problem, every in- 
tricate queftion will not baffle, difcourage, or 
break it. But though putting the mind unpre- 
pared upon an unufual ftrefs, that may difcourage 
or damp it for the future, ought to be avoided ; 
yet this muft not run it, by an over great mynefs of 
difficulties, into a lazy fauntering about ordinary 
and obvious things, that demand no thought or 
application. This debafes and enervates the un- 
derstanding, makes it weak and unfit for labour. 
This is a fort of hovering about the furface of 
tilings, without any infight into them or penetra- 
tion . and when the mind has been once habitua- 
ted to this lazy recumbency and fatisfaction on the 
obvious furface of things, it is in danger to reft 
Satisfied there, and go no deeper, fince it cannot 
do it without pains and digging. He that has for 
fome time accultomed h'imlelf to take up with 
what eafily offers itfelf at firft view, has reafon to 
fear he ihall never reconcile himfelf to the fatigue 
or turning and tumbling things in his mind to 
difc over their more retired and more valuable fe- 
crets. 

It is not ftrange that methods of learning which 

Scholars have been accultomed to in their begin- 



7» THE CONDUCT OF 

WORDS. 

ning and entrance upon the fciences, mould in- 
fluence them all their lives, and be fettled in their 
minds by an over-ruling reverence, efpecially if 
they be fuch as univerfal ufe has e:labli(hed. 
Learners muft at firft be believers, and their mas- 
ter's rules having been once made axioms to them, 
it is no wonder they fhould keep that dignity, and 
by the authority they have once got, miflead thofe 
who think it fufiicient to excufe them, if they go 
out of their way in a well beaten track. 



SECTION XXVIII. 
WORD S» 

I have copioufly enough fpoken of the abufe 
of words in another place, and therefore (hall up- 
on this reflection, that the fciences are full of 
them, warn thofe that would conduct their un- 
derftandings right, not to take any term, howfo- 
ever authorized by the language of the fchools, 
to Hand for anything, till they have an idea of it. 
A word may be of frequent ufe and great credit 
with feveral authors, and be by them made ufe of, 
as if it flood for focne real being; but yet if he 
that reads cannot frame any diftinct idea of that 
bring, it is certainly to him a mere empty found 
without a meaning, and he learns no more I 
that is faid of it, or attributed to it, than if it 
were affirmed only of that bare empty found. 
They who would advance in knowledge, and not 
deceive and fwell themfelves with a little articu- 
lated air, fhould lay down this as a fundamental- 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 71 

WORDS. 

rule, not to take words for things, nor fuppofe 
that names in books fignify real entities in nature, 
till they can frame clear and diftinct ideas of thofe 
entities. It will not perhaps be allowed, if I 
fliould fet down fubftantia '■ forms and intentiona. /pe- 
des, as fuch that mayjuftly be fufpectcd to be of 
this kind of infignificant terms. But this I am 
fure, to one that can form no determined ideas of 
what they ftand for, they iignify nothing at all; 
and all that he thinks he knows about them, is to 
him fo much knowledge about nothing, and 
amounts at moll but to a learned ignorance. It 
is not without all reafon fuppofed, that there are 
many fuchtempty terms to be found in fome learn- 
ed writers, to which they had recourfe to etch 
out their fyftems, where their underftancfings could 
not furniln them with conceptions from things. 
But yet I believe the fuppofing of fome realities 
in nature, anfwering thofe and the like words, 
have much perplexed fome, and quite milled 
others in the ftudy of nature. That which in 
any difcourfe fignifies, / know not what, fhould 
be confidered I know not when. Where men have 
any conceptions, they can, if they are ever fo 
abftrufe or abftracled, explain them, and the terms 
they uie for them. For our conceptions being 
nothing but ideas, which are all made up of fim- 
ple ones, if they cannot give us the ideas their 
words ftand for, it is plain they have none. To 
what purpofe can it be to hunt after his concep- 
tions, who has none, or none diftinct ? He that 
knew not what he himfelf meant by a learned 
term, cannot make us know any thing by his 
ufe of it, let us beat our heads about it ever fo 
long. Whether we are able to comprehend all 



7* THE CONDUCT Or 

W A N DE R I N G . 

the operations of nature, and the manners of them, 
it matters not to enquire •, but this is certain, that 
we can comprehend no more of them than we can 
diftinctly conceive : and therefore to obtrude tei ms 
where we have no diftinct conceptions, as if they 
did contain or rather conceal fomething, is but an 
artifice of learned vanity, to cover a defect in an 
hypothecs or our undei {landings. Words are 
not made to conceal, but to declare and fhew 
fomething : where they are by thofe, who pretend 
to infrruct, otherwife ufed, they conceal indeed 
fomething ; but that which they conceal is no- 
thing but the ignorance, error, or fophiftry of the 
talker *, for there is, in truth, nothing elfe under 
them. 



SECTION XXIX. 
V/ A N D E R 1 N G. 

That there is a conftant fuccefnon and flux cf 
ideas in our minds, I have obferved in the former 
part of this tlTay ; and every one may take notice 
of it in himfelf. This I fuppofe may deferve fome 
part of our care in the conduct of our under- 
standings : and I think it may be of great advan- 
tage, if wc can by ufe get that power over cur 
minds, as to be able to direct that train cr idea?, 
that fo, fince there will no new ones perpetually 
come into our thoughts by a conftant fucceffion, 
we may be able by choice fo to direct them, that 
none may come in view but fuch as are pertinent 
to our prefeht enquiry, and in fuch order as may 
be mo': ufeful to the difcovefy we are upon ; cr 
at Ieaft, if feme foreign and unfought ideas will 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 

W ANDERING. 

offer themfelves, that yet we might be able to re- 
ject them, and keep them from taking off our 
minds from its prdTent purfurt, and hinder t] 
from running away with our thoughts quite from 
the lu 'eject in hand. This is not, 1 fufpeft, {o eafy 
to be done as perhaps may be imagined ; and yet, 
for aught I know, this may be, if not the chief, 
vet one of the great differences that carry fome 
men in their reafoning io far beyond others, where 
they feem to be naturally of equal parts. A pro- 
per and effectual remedy for this wandering of 
thoughts I mould be glad to find. He that mall 
propofe fuch an one, would do great fervice to the 
fiudious and contemplative part of mankind, and 
unthinking men to become think- 
ing. I muft acknowledge that hitherto I have 
di (covered no other way to keep cur thoughts 
clofe to their bufinefs, but the endeavouring as 
much as we can, arid by frequent attention and 
application, getting the habit of attention 
application. He that will obferve children, 
find, that even when they endeavour their utter- 
mo it, they cannot keep their minds from ftcag- 
gling. The way to cure it, I am fatisfied, is net 
angry chiding or beating, for that prefentiy fills 
their heads with all the ideas that fear, dread, or 
copfunon can oiler to them. To bring back 
gently their wandering thoughts, by leading them 
into the path, and going before them in the train 
til y mould purfue, without any rebuke, or fomuch 
as taking notice (where it can be avoided) of their 
roving, I iuppofe would fooner reconcile and inure 
them to attention, than all thofe rougher methods 
which more diftracl their thought, ?^d hindering 
the application they would promote, introduce a 
contrary habit. 

H 



7 % .THE CONDUCT O* 

SECTION XXX. 
DISTINCTION. 

Diftinccion znd divifion are, (if I mifhke not 
the import of the words) very different things ; 
the one being the perception of a difference that 
nature has placed in things ; the other our making 
a divifion where there is" yet none ; at leaft, if I 
may be permitted to consider them in this fenfe, I 
think I may fay of them, that one of them is the 
molt neeefiary and conducive to true knowledge 
that can be ; the other, when too much made ui'z 
of, ferves only to puzzle and confound the under- 
standing. To obferve every the leaft: difference 
that is in things, -argues a quick and clear fight, 
and this keeps the underftanding fteady, and right 
in its way to knowledge. But though it be ufe- 
ful to difcern every variety that is to be found in 
nature, yet it is not convenient to confider every 
rence that is in things, and divide them into 
: under every inch difference. This 

■will run us, if followed, into particulars, (for eve- 
ry individual has fomething that differences it 
from another) and we flia'H be able toeftablifli no 
general truths, or elfe at leaft (hail be apt to per- 
plex the mind about them. The collection of 
J t ral thii "• into feveral clailes, gives the mind 
•more general and larger views ; but we nuift t.ike 
care to unite them only in that •, and to far as 
they do agree, for fo far they may be united un- 
der the consideration. For entity itklf, that 
comprehends ail things, as general as it is, may 
afford us clear and rational conceptions. I 
in qui minds what ir i 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 75 

DISTINCTION. 

are considering, that would beft inilruct us when 
we fhould or fhould net branch into farther dii- 
■ lieh are to be taken only from 3 due 
contemplation of things; to which there is no- 
thing more oppofite than the art of verbal diftinc- 
tions, made at pleafure, in learned and arbitrarily 
invented terms to be applied at a venture, without: 
comprehending or conveying any diffract notions; 
and ib altogether fitted to artificial talk,, or empty 
noife in dilpute, without any clearing of difficul- 
ties, or advance in knowledge, Whatfoever fub- 
ject we examine, and would get knowledge in, we 
fhould, I think, make as general and as large as 
it will bear ; nor can there be any danger of this, 
if the idea of it be fettled and determined : for if 
that be fo, we {halt e. -guifli it from any 

other idea, though comprehended under the fame 
name. For it is to fence againft the intangkments 
of equivocal word : great art of fophiftry 

which lies in them, that distinctions have been 
multiplied, and their ufe thought neceflary. But 
had every diitinct a bit race" idea a duiinct known 
name, there would be little need of thefe multi- 
plied fcholaftic diftinctions, though there would be 
neveithelefs as much need ftiil of tl *s ob- 

tie differences that arc in th I dif- 

. . from anothei , 

« 

iot therefore the right way to knowledge, to 

hunt after and fill the head with abundance of 

and (cholaffo , wherewith 

learned men's writings are often filled ; and we 

times find what they treat of ib divided and 

ffibdivided, that the mind of t lie mod attentive 

.s the fight of it, a^ it is more than pro- 

; for in things crumb- 

il 2 



-fj T H E C O N D U C T O F 

I istinction. • 
led into dure, it is in \n\n to affect or pretend 
order, or expect clearnefs. To avoid confuiion 
by too tew or tco many diyifions, 15 a great (kill 
in thinking as well as writing, which is but the 
copying our thoughts -, but what are the bound 
of the mean between the two virions excefTes on 
both hands, I think is hard to fet down in words : 
clear and diftinct ideas is all that I yet know able 
to regulate it. But as to verbal diftinctions re- 
ceived and applied to common terms, i. e. equivo- 
cal words, they are more properly, I think, the 
bufinefs of critic. fm r-nd- dictionaries, than of real 
knowledge and philofophy \ fince they, for the 
more part, explain the meaning of words, and give 
us their feveral fignifications. - The dexterous 
management of terms, and being able to fend 
and prove with them, I know has and does 
pafs in the world for a great part o^ learning, 
but it is learning cliftincT: from knowledge ; for 
..ledge cendiis only in perceiving the ha- 
bitudes and relations of ideas one to another 
which is done without words : the interven- 
tion of a found helps nothing to it. And. 
hence we fee that there is leaft uie of diftinctions 
where there is moft knowledge •, I mean in mathe- 
matics, where men have determined ideas with 
known names to them •, and fo there being no 
room for equivocations, there is no need of dif- 
tinctions. In arguing, the opponent ufes as com- 
prehenfive and equivocal terms as he can, to in- 
volve his adverfary in the doubtfulneis of his 
txpreirions : this is expected, and therefore the 
anfwerer on his fide makes it his play to diflinguifk 
r.s much as he can, and thinks he can never 
do it too much ; nor can he indeed in that way 
wherein victorv may be had without truth and 



THE UNDERSTANDING, 77 

DISTINCTION. 

without knowledge. This Teems to me to be the 
art of difputing. Ufe your words as captioufly as 
you can in your arguing on one fide, and apply 
diftinctions as much as you can on the other iide, 
to every term, to nonplus your opponent : (b that 
in this fort of fchohrlhip, there being no bounds 
fet to diftinguifhing, fome men have thought all 
acutenefs to have lain in it : and therefore in all 
ihey have read or thought on, their great bufinefs 
has been to amufe themfelves with diftindtions, and 
multiply to themfelves divifions, at lead, more- 
than the nature of the thing required. There 
feems to me, as I faid, to be no other rule for this, 
but a due and right confederation of things as they 
arc in themfelves. He that has fettled in his mind 
determined ideas with names affixed to them, will 
be able both to diicem their dirTerences one from 
another, which is really diftinguifhing ; and where 
enury of words affords not terms anfwering 
y diftinct idea, will be able to apply proper dif-'- 
tinguifhing terms to the comprehenfive and equi- 
vocal names he is forced to make ufe of. This is 
all the need I know of diftinguifhing terms; and 
in fuch verbal diftinctions, each term of the dif- 
tinction joined to that whofe iignification it diftin- 
guifhes, is but a diftinct 'name for a diftinc't idea. 
Where they aie fo, and men have clear and dif- 
tincl conceptions that anfwer their verbal diftincti- 
ons, they are right, and are pertinent as far as 
they ferve to clear any thing in the fubject under 
confideration. And this is that which feems to 
me the proper and only meafure of distinctions 
and divifions ; which, he that will conduct- his 
undcrftaiidin<i right, muft not look for in the acute- 

"3 



'} 3 THE CONDUCT OF 

DISTINCTION. 

ncfc of invention, nor the authority of write 

but will find only in the confederation of things 
themfelves, whether they are led into it by their 
own meditations, or the information of hooks. 

An r.ptnefs to jumble things together, wherein 
can be found any likenefe, is a fault in the under- 
standing on the other fide, which will not fail to 
mill -ad it, and by thus lumping of things, hinder 
the mind from dutinct and accurate conceptions of 
them. 



S E C T I O N XXXI, 
SIMILE S. 



To which let me here add another near of kin 
to this, at leaft in name, and that is, letting the 
mind upon the iuggeftion of any new notion, run 
immediately after limiies, to make it the ciearer to 
itfelf *, which, though it mry be a good way, and 
ufeful in the explaining our thoughts to others, 
yet it is by no means a right method to fettle true 
notions of anything in ourfeives: becaufe fimiies 
always fail in fome part, and come Ihort of that 
exaetnefs which our conceptions mould have to 
things, if we would think aright. This indeed 
makes men piaufible talkers : for thofc are always 
mof: acceptable in difcourfe, who have the way to 
let their thoughts into other men's minds, with the 
greater! eafe and facility ; whether thofe thoughts 
zvt well formed and correfpond with things, mat- 
ters not j few men care to be instructed but at an 
eafy rate. They who in their difcourfe ftrike the 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 79 

SIMILES. 

fancy* and take the hearers ' conceptions along 
v/ith them as fait as their words flow?, are the ap- 

,d talkers, and go for tne only men of clear 
thoughts. Nothing contributes fo much to this 
as Smiles, men think they themfclves un- 

derftand better, becauie they are better underiiood. 
Bat it is one thing to think right, and another 
thing to know the right way to lay our thoughts 
before others with advantage and clearnefs, be 
they right or wrong. Well chofen iimiles, meta- 
phors, and allegories,, with method and order, do 
this the beft cf any thing, becaufe being taken 
from objects already known, and familiar to the 
understanding, they are conceived as fait as fpo- 
ken j and the correfpondence being concluded, 
the thing they are brought to explain and eluci- 
date is thought to be underftood too. Thus fan- 
cy pafTes for knowledge, and what is prettily faid 
is miftaken for folid. I fay not this to decry me- 
taphor, or with defign to take away that ornament 
of fpeech-, my bufinefs here is not with rhetori- 
cians and orators, but with philofophers and 
lovers of truth ; to whom I would beg leave to 
give this one rule whereby to try whether, in the 
application of their thoughts to any thing for the 
improvement of their knowledge, they do in truth 
comprehend the matter before them really fuch as 
it is in itfclf. The way to difcover this is to ob- 
ferve, whether in the laying it before themfclves 
or others, they make ufe only of borrowed repre- 
fentations, and ideas foreign to the things which 
are applied to it by way of accommodation ; as 
bearing fome proportion or imagined iikenefs to 
the fubject under confideration. Figured and 
metaphorical expreffions do well to illuftrate more 



8o THE CONDUCT OF' 

SIMILES, 

abftrufe and unfamiliar ideas which the mind is 
net yet thoroughly accuftomed to ; but then they 
mult be made ufe of .to illustrate ideas that we 
already have, not to paint to us thofe which we 
yet have not. .Such borrowed and allufive ideas 
may follow real and folid truth, to fet it off when 
found ; but muft by no means be let in its place, 
and taken for it. It all our fearch has vet reached 

i 

no farther than fimile and metaphor, we may 
alTure ourfclves we rather fancy than know, and 
are not yet penetrated into the infide and rt 
of the thing, be it what it will ; but content our- 
ielves with what our imaginations, not things 
fckemfelves, furnifh us with. > 



SECTION XX XI 2, 
ASSENT. 

In the whole conduct of the underftanding,; 

there is nothing of more moment than to know 
when and where, and how far to give aiTent ; and 
poffibly there is nothing harder. It is very cafily 
and no body queftions it, that giving and 
withholding our aiTent, and the degreesofit, fhould 
be regulated by the evidence which things carry 
with them ; and yet we fee men are not the better 
for this rule ; ibrne firmly embrace doctrines up- 
on flight grounds, fome upon no grounds, and 
feme contrary to appearance. Some admit of 
certainty, and are not to be moved in what they 
hold ; others waver in every thing, and there 
want not thofe that reject: all as uncertain. What 



1 HE U N D E R STANDING. 8 I 

ASSENT. 

then (hall a novice, an enquirer, a ftranger do in 
the cafe ? I anfwer, ufe his eyes. There is a cor- 
refpondente in things, and agreement ancM.ia- 
greement in ideas, discernible in very different 

es, and there are eyes in men to fee them if 
they pleale j only their eyes may be dimmed or 
dazzled, and the difcerning fight in them impaired 
or loft. Intertit and paffion dazzle, the cuftom 
of arguing on any lide,even againft our perfuafions, 
dims the understanding, and makes it by degrees 
lofe the faculty of difcerning clearly between truth 
and falihood, and fo of adhering to the right fide. 
It is not fate to play with error, and dreis it up to 
ourfelves or others in the fhape of truth. The 
mind by degrees lofes its natural rehfh of real 
folid truth, is reconciled infenfibly to any thing 
that can but be drefled up into any faint appear- 
ance of it ; and if the fancy be allowed the place 
of judgment at fir ft in fport, it afterwards comes 
by ufe to ulurp it, and what is recommended by 
this flatterer, (that ftudies bat to pleaie) is received 
for good. There are h many ways of fallacy, 
fuch. arts of giving colours, appearances and re- 
fembiances by this court drefTer, the fancy, that 
he who is not wary to admit nothing but truth 
iticlf, very careful not to make his mind iubfer- 
vient to any thing ehe, cannot but be caught, rii 
that has a mind to believe, has half alien ted alrea- 
dy j and he that by often arguing againft ins own 

, impofesfaiihoods on others, is not far from 
believing himiclf. This takes away the great dis- 
tance there is betwixt truth and faiihood ; it bi 
them almoft together, and makes it no great odds 
in things that approach fo near which you : . 
end when things are brought to that pa. 



3 2 THE CO:-. D U C T OF 

ASSENT. 
or intereft, &c. eafify, and without bernj 
ed, determine which .. right. 



SECTION XXXI 11 = 
I X D I F F E R E N C Y. 

I have faid above, that we ihould keep ape: 

rndifFerency for all opinions, not wi(h any of them 

true, or try to make them appear fo ; but being 

fFerent, receive and embrace them according Z3 

evidence, and that alone, gives the atteftation of 

truth. 1 : do thus, i. e. keep their m 

indifferent tc as, to be determined only be 

V : 6ndtheunderftan::'r. : :;;.s e » 

ception enough to diftinguifh between evidence 

or no evidence, betwixt plain and doubtful ; and 

if they neither give nor refufe their afient but by 

that meafure, they will be fafe in the opinions they 

have. .eh being perhaps but few, this 

3n will have alio this good in it, that it will 

put them upon considering, and t i the 

(Ety o: examining mere th ... 

-le of ir.. .- 
not ti*e i\oi 
I Co not keep u-p this . ncy in them: 

7>rc ah but truth, not f , but evidenced in 

• . - ami 

then think th i ; the 

hich the; upon 

...- . ..... . 

me be j . - to the 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 83 

INDIFEERENCT. 

.'grounds and clearnefs wherewith every truth is 
We to be made out, or that men (hould be 
perfectly kept from error: that is more than hu- 
man nature can by any means be advanced to ; I 
aim at no inch unattainable privilege: I am only 
'hey fnouid do 9 who would deil 
with their own minds, and make a right uie 
of their faculties in the purtuit of truth : we fail 
them a great deal more than they fail us. It is 
mismanagement mere than want of abilities that 
men have reafon to complain of, and which they 
actually do complain of in thofi frOm 

them. He that by an indifferency for all but 
truth, (afters not his anent to go falter than his 
nee, nor beyond it, will learn to ex mine, 
and examine fairly inftead of prefuming ; and no 
body will be at a lofs or in danger for want of 
embracing thofe truths which ar ary in his 

ftation and circu mi In any other way but 

this, all the world are born to orthodoxy: they 
imbibe at firll the allowed opinions of their coun- 
try and party, and fo never queftioning their truth, 
•not one of an hundred ever examines. Thev are 
applauded for prefuming they are in the right. 
•He that coniidei s, is a foe to orthodoxy, becaufe 
poffibly he may deviate from fome of the receiv- 
ed doctrines there. And thus men without any 
induftry or acquisition of their own, inherit local 
truths (for it : ■ lame every where 1 ; and are 

enured to afient without evidence. This i: 
ences farther than is thought ; for what one of 
an hundred of the zealous bigots in all parties, 
ever examined the tenets he is fo ftiff in, or ever 
thought it his bullncfs or duty fo to do : It is fuf- 
pected of lukewarmnefs to iuppofe it neceflary, 
and a tendency to apoftacy to go about it. 



4$4 THE CONDUCT OF 

INDIFFERENCY. 

if a man can bring his m;nd once to be pofitive 
and fierce for potations, tfhofe evidence he has ne- 
ver once examined, and that in matters of gueaterl 
concernment to him, what (hail keep him from 
this fhort and eafy waj of being in the right in 
cafes of lefs moment ? Th are taught to 

clothe our minds as we do our bodies, after the 
'faihion in vogue, and it is accounted fantastical- 
nefs, or fomething worfe not to do fo. This cuf- 
tom (which who dares oppofe) makes the (hort- 
fighted bigots, and the warier fceptics, as far as 
it prevails. And thofe that break from it are in 
danger of herefy ; for taking the whole world, 
how much of it doth truth and orthodoxy poffefs 
together ? Though it is by the lalt alone (which 
has the good luck to be every where) that error 
and herefy are judged of-, for argument and evi- 
dence lignify nothing in the cafe, and excufe no 
where, but are litre to be borne down in all foci- 
eties by the infallible orthodoxy of the place. 
Whether this be the way to truth and right af- 
fent, let the opinions that take place and prefcribe 
in the feveral habitable parts of the earth, declare. 
I never (aw any reafon yet why truth might not 
be trufted to its own evidence : I am fure if that 
be not able to fupport it, there is no fence againft 
error ; and then truth and falihood are but names 
that ftand for the fame things. Evidence there- 
fore is that by which alone every man is (and 
fhould be) taught to regulate his afTent, who is 
then and then only in the right way when he fol- 
lows it. 

Men deficient in knowledge, are ufually in one 
of thefe three {fates, either wholly ignorant, or as 
doubting of ibme proportion they have either 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 85 

IGNORANCE WITH INDIFFERENCY. 

embraced formerly, or at preftnt are inclined to : 
or, laftlf, they do with aflitrance hold and pro- 

without ever having examined, and been con- 

. .: by well grounded arguments. 

The firft of thefe are in the belt ftate of the 
three, by having their minds yet in their perfect 
freedom and indifferency, the likelier to puriue 
truth the better, having no bias yet clapped on to 
-mi He ad them. 



SECTION XXXIV. 
IGNORANCE WITH INDIFFERENCY. 

For ignorance with an indifferency for truth is 
nearer to it, than opinion with ungrounded incli- 
nation, which is the great fource of error : and they 
pre more in danger to go out of the way, who are 
marching under the conduct of a guide, that it is 
an hundred to one will miflead them, than he that 
has not yet taken a ftep, and is likelier to be pre- 
vailed on to enquire after the right way. The lait 
of the three forts are in the worit condition of 
'all •, for if a man can be perfnaded and fu.ly allured 
of any thing for a truth, without having examin- 
ed what is there that he may not embrace for 
truth ; and if he has given himfelf up to believe 
a lie, what means is there left to recover one who 
canbeaffured without examining ? To the other 
two, this I crave leave to fay, that as he that is ig- 
norant is in the belt ftate of the two, fo he fhould 
I 



£6 THE CONDUCT OF 

IGNORANCE WITH I N D I FFE R EN CY. 

purfue truth in a method fuitable to that fhte, 
i. e. by enquiring directly into the nature of the 
thing itfelf,without minding the opinions of others, 
or troubling himfelf with their quefncns or dif- 
putes about it, but to fee what he himfelf can, 
fincerely fearching after truth, find out. He that 
proceeds upon other principles in his enquiry into 
any fciences, though he be reiblved to examine 
them and judge of them freely, dees yet at lead 
.put himfelf on that iide, and poft himfelf in a 
party, which he will not quit till he be beaten out ; 
by which the mind is inienfibly engaged to make 
what defence it can, and fo is unawares Dialled. I 
do not fay but a man mould embrace fome opinion 
when h# has examined, elfe be examines to no pur- 
pofe ; but the fureft and fafeft '.ray is to have no 
opinion at all till he has examined, and that with- 
out .any the leaft regard to the opinions or 
fvftems of other men about it. For example, 
were it my bufinefs to imderlrand phyfic, would 
not the fafer and readier way be to confuit nature 
herfelf, and inform myfelf in the hiffory of dif- 
eafes and their cures, than efpouiingthe principles 
of the dogmatifts, methodifts or chy mills, engage 
in all the difputes concerning either of thofe fyf- 
tems, and fuppofe it be true, till I have tried what 
they can fay to beat me cut of it. Or, fiippofing 
that Hippocrates^ or any other book, infallibly con- 
tains the whole art of phyfic, would not the direct 
way be to ftudy, read, and coniider that book, 
weigh and compare the parts of it, to find the 
truth, rather than cfpouie the doctrines of any 
party ? who, though, they acknowledge his autho- 
rity, have already interpreted and wiredrawn all 
his text to their own fenle ; the tincture whereof 
when I have imbibed, I am more in danger to 



THE UNDERSTANDING. $J 

QUESTION. 

mifanderftand his true meaning, than if I had 
come to him with a mind unprepofTefTcd by doc- 
tors and commentators of my fe&j whole reafon- 
ings, interpretation, and language, which I have 
been ufed to, will of courfe make all chime that 
way, and make another, and perhaps the genuine 
meaning of the author feem harm, {trained and 
uncouth to me. For words having; naturally none 
of their own, carry that fignification to the hearer, 
that he is ufed to put upon them, whatever be 
the fenfe of him that tries them. This, I think, 
is villbiy fo ; and if it be, he that begins to have 
any doubt of any of his tenets, which, he received 
without examination, ought, as much as he can, 
to out himielf wholly into this ftate of igrfbrancc 
in reference to that queftion, and throwing whollv 
by all his former notions, and the opinions ci 
others, examine, with a perfect indirfcrency, the 
queftion in its fource, without any inclination to 
cither fide, or any regard to his or others' unex- 
amined opinions. This I own is no eafy thing to 
do, but I am not enquiring the eafy way to opi- 
nion, but the right way to truth •, which they 
muit follow who will deal fairly with their 
understandings and their own fouls. 



SECTION xxxv. 
Q^U E S T I O N. 

The indifferency that I here propofe, will 
le them to ftate the queftion right, which they 
are in doubt about, without which they can never 
come to a fair and clear deciiion of it. 
I 2 



S3 TBE CONDUCT Ol 

SECTION XXXVI, 

PRES'JlirTIGN. 

Another fruit from this inctifferency, and tfie 

iering things in themfetaes, abftracl from our 
Cwn opinions and other men's notions and difcour- 
fes on them, will be that each man will purfue his 
thoughts in that method which will be moft agree- 
able to the nature of the thing, and to his appre- 
henfion of what it fuggefrs to him; in which he 
ought to proceed with regularity and conftancy, 
until he come to a well grounded refohition 
wherein he may acquiefce. If it be objected, that 
this will require every man to be a fcholar, and 
quit all his other bufinefs, and betake himfelf 
wholly to (tuny ; I anfsver, I propofe no more to 
any one than he has time for. Some men's ftate 
and condition requires no great extent of know- 
ledge •, the nectiiary proviiion for life fwallows the 
greateft part of their time. But one man's want 
of leiiure is no excufe for the ofcitancy and igno- 
rance of thefe who have time to fp?rc •, and eve- 
ry one has enough, to get as much knowledge as 
is required and expected of him •, and he that c'oes 
not that, is in love with ignorance, and is account- 
able for it. 

section ::: 
presumption. 

The variety of diftempers in men's minds, is r-s 
great as of thofe in their bodies ; fame are epidc- 



THE UNDERSTANDING. Sp 

PRESUMPTION. 

mic, fewefcape them ; and every one too, if he 
would look into himfelf, would find Tome defect 
of his particular genius. There is fcarce any one 
without fome idiofyncrafy that he fuffers by. This 
man prefumes upon his parts, that they will not 
fail him at time of need ; and fo thinks it fuper- 
fluous labour to make . i ifioo before hand. 

His understanding is to him like Fortunatus^s purfe, 
which is always to furniih him, without ever 
putting any thing into it before hand, and fo he 
fits ftill fatisfied, without endeavouring to ftore 
his understanding with knowledge. It is the 
fpontaneous product of the country, aod * 
need of labour in tillage ? Such men may fpread 
their native riches before the ignorant j but they 
were beft not come to ftrefs and trial with the 
Ikilful. We are born ignorant of every thing. 
The fuperficies of things that furround them, 
makes impreffions on the negligent, but no body 
penetrates into the iniide without labour, atten- 
tion and induitry. Stones and timber grow of 
themfelves: but yet there is no uniform pile 
fymmetry and convenience to lodge in, without: 
toil and pains. God has made the intelh 
world harmonious and beautiful without us ; but 
it will never come into our heads all at once, we 
mud: bring it home piecemeal, and there fet it up 
by our own industry; or elfe we (hall have nothing 
but darknefs and chaos within, whatever order 
and Ught there be in things without us. 
I 3 



THE CONDUCT OP 

SECTION XXXVIII. 
DESPONDENCY. 



On the other fide, there are others that deprefs 
their own minds, defpond at the firrft difficulty, 
and conclude that the getting an infight in any of 
the fciences, or making any progrefs in know- 
ledge, farther than ferves their ordinary bufrnefs, 
is above their capacities. Thefe lit ftill, becaufe 
they think they have not legs to go as the others 
I lad mentioned do, becaufe they think they have 
wings to fly, and can foar on high when they 
pleafe. To thefe latter, one may for anfwer apply 
the proverb, life legs and have legs. No body 
knows what ftrength of parts he has, till he has 
tried them. And of the understanding one may 
moft truly fay, that its force is greater generally 
than it thinks, till it is put to it. Virefque acqmrit 
eundo. 

And therefore the proper remedy here, is but 
to let the mind to work, and apply the thoughts 
vigoroully to the bufinefs : for it holds in the 
fhuggles of the mind, as in thofe of war, Dum 
putantfe <vincere> vicere; a periuaiion that we fhall 
overcome any difficulties that we meet with in the 
fciences, feldoni fails to carry us through thent; 
No body knows the ftrength of his mind, and the 
force of {ready and regular application till he has 
tried. This is certain, he that lets out upon weak 
legs, will not only go farther, but grow ftronger 
too than one who with a vigorous conflitution and 
firm limbs; onlv fits ftill. 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 01 

DESPONDENCY. 

Something of kin to this men mny obferve In 
themfelves, when the mind frights itfelf (as it of- 
ten does) with any thing reflected on in grofs, and 
tranfiently viewed confufedly and at a distance. 
Things thus offered to the mind, carry the (hew 
of nothing but difficulty in them, and are thought 
to be wrapped up in impenetrable obfeuriry. But 
the truth is 5 thefe are nothing but fpectres that 
the underfhnding raifes to itfelf, to flatter its own 
lazinefs. It fees nothing diftinctly in things re- 
mote, and in a huddle, and therefore concludes 
too faintly, that there is nothing more clear to be 
diicovered in them. It is but to approach nearer, 
and that mift of our own railing that enveloped 
them, will remove ; and thole that in that mift 
appeared hideous giants not to be grappled with, 
will be found to be of the ordinary and natural 
iize and fhape. Things that in a remote and confu- 
ted view feem very obfeure, rr.uft be approached 
by gentle and regular fteps ; and what is moft vi- 
iible, eafy, and obvious in them, firft considered. 
Reduce them into their diifinct parts ; and then 
in their due order bring all that ihould be known 
concerning every one of thofe parts, into plain 
and fimple queftions ; and then what was thought 
obfeure, perplexed, and too hard for our weak 
parts, will lay itfelf open to the underltanding in 
a fair view, and let the mind into that which be- 
fore it was awed with, and kept at a diflance from, 
as wholly myfterious. I appeal to my reader's 
experience, whether this has never happened to 
him, efoecially when bufy on one thing, he has 
occasionally reflected on another. I afk him, 
whether he has never thus been feared with a fud- 
<kn opinion of mighty difficulties, which yet have 



92 THE CONDUCT OF 

DESPONDENCY. 

vanifhed, when he has feriouflv and methodically 
applied himfelf to the consideration of t&is fcem- 
ing terrible lubject ; and there has been no other 
matter of aftoniiliment left, but that he amufed. 
himfelf with lb difcouraging a profpect of his own 
railing about a matter, which in the handling was 
found to have nothing in it more iirange nor in- 
tricate than fcveral other thin2S which he had 

o 

long iincc, and with eafe maftered ? This experi- 
ence would teach us how to deal with fuch - 
bears another time, which fhould rather fcrve to 
excite our vigor, than enervate our induftry. The 
fureff. way for a learner in this, as in all other ca- 
fes, is not to advance by jumps and large ftrides ; 
let that which he fets himfelf to learn next, be 
indeed the next, i. e. as nearly conjoined with 
what he knows already as is poilible •, let it be dif- 
tinct but not remote from it : let it be new, and 
what he did not know before ; that the under- 
standing may advance : but let it be as "little at once 
as may be, that its advances may be clear and lure. 
All the ground that it gets this way it will hold. 
This difti net gradual growth in knowledge is firm 
and fure,it carries its own light with it in every frep 
of its progrcinon in an ealy and orderly train, 
than which there is nothing of more uie to the 
understanding. And though this perhaps may 
feem a very How and lingering way to knowledge; 
yet I dare confidently affirm, that whoever will 
try it in himfelf, or any one he will teach, mall 
find the advances greater in this method, than 
they would in the lame fpace of time have been 
in any other he could have taken. The greateft 
part of true knowledge lies in a diftinct percep- 
tion of things in themfeives diftinct. Andfomemen 
give more clear light and knowledge by the bare dif- 



THE V It D E US T A N DIN G. 93 

ANALOGY, 
ti net Stating of aqueftion, than others by taking of it 
in grofs whole hours together. In this, they who 
fo ft ate a queftion, do no more but Separate and 
difcntangle the parts of it one from another, and 
lay them, when fo difentangled, in their due order. 
This often, without any mere ado, refolves the 
doubt, and {hews the mind where the truth lies. 
The agreement or disagreement of the ideas in 
queSVion, when they are once feparated and dii- 
tinctly confidered, is, in many cafes, prefestly 
perceived, and thereby clear and lafting knowledge 
gained ; whereas things in grofs taken up together, 
and To lying together in confufion, can produce 
in the mind bui a confufed, which in effect, is no 
knowledge ; or at leaft when it comes to be exa- 
mined and made ufe of, will prove little better 
than none. I therefore take the liberty to repeat 
here again, what I have faid elfewhere, that in 
learning any thing, as little mould be propofed to 
the mind at once as is pellicle \ and that being un- 
derstood and fully maftered, to proceed to the 
next adjoining part yet unknown, Simple, unper- 
p'exed proposition belonging to the matter in hand, 
and tending to the clearing what is principally de- 
figrted. 



SECTION XXXIX. 
ANALOGY. 

Analogy is of great ufe to the mind in many 

5, especially in natural philofophy, and that 

part of it chiefly which confifts in happy and fuc- 

cefsful experiments. But here we mutt take cars 

tli.it we keep ourfelves within that wherein the 



C4 T M £ C O N D U C T O F 

ASSOCIATION. 

analogy confifts. For example, the acid oil of 
vitriol is found to be good in fuch a cafe, therefore 
the fpirit of nitre or vinegar may be uSed in the 
like cafe. If the good effect of it be owing wholly 
to the acidity of it, the trial may be juftified ; but 
if there be fomething elfe befides the acidity in 
the oil of vitriol, which produces the good we de- 
fire in the cafe, we miltake that for analogy, which 
is not, and fufrer our understanding to be mis- 
guided by a wrong fuppoiition of analogy where 
there is none. 



SECTION XL. 
ASSOCIATION. 

Though I have in the fecond hook of my efiay 
concerning human underftanding, treated of the 
affociation of ideas ; yet having done it there his- 
torically, as giving a view of the understanding 
in this, as well as its feveral other ways of opera- 
ting, rather than defigni-.ig there to enquire into 
the remedies, that ought to be applied to it ; it 
will, under this latter consideration, afford other 
matter of thought to thofe who have a mind to 
inftruct themfelves thoroughly in the right way of 
conducting their underltandings ; and that the 
rather, btcaufe this, if I miilake not, is as fre- 
quent a caufe of mistake and error in us, as per- 
haps any thing elfe that can be named ; and is a 
dileafe of the mind as hard to be cured as any ; it 
being a \tvy hard thing to convince any one that 
things are not fo, and naturallv fo as they con- 
stantly appear to him. 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 95 

ASSOCIATION. 

By this one eafy and unheeded mifcarriage of 
the understanding, fandy and loofe foundations 
become infallible principles, and will not furrer 
themfelves to be touched or queftioned : fuch un- 
natural connections become by cullom as natural 
to the mind, as fun and light. Fire and warmth 
go together, and fo feem to carry with them as 
natural an evidence as felt-evident truths them- 
felves. And where then (hall one with hopes of 
fuccefs begin the cure ? Many men firmly embrace 
faifhcod for truth ; not only bec.uile they never 
thought otherwife, but alio becaufe thus blinded 
as they have been from the beginning, they never 
could think otherwife ; at \>:v.i\ without a vigor 
of mind able to conteft the empire of habit, and 
look into its own principles ; a freedom which 
few men have the notion of in themfelves, and 
fewer are allowed the practice of by others : it 
being the great art and bufinefs of the teachers 
and guides in melt feels., to fupprefs, as much as 
they can, this fundamental duty which every man 
owes himfclf, and is the firft iteady ftep towards 
right and truth in the whole train of his actions 
and opinions. This would give one reafon to fuf- 
ptctj that fuch teachers are confeious to themfelves 
•of the falfhood or weaknefs of the tenets they pro- 
fefs; iince they willnot fuller the grounds whereon 
they are built to be examined : whereas thofc who 
feek truth only, and defire to own and propagate no- 
thing elfe, freely expofe theirprinciples to the teff, 
are pleafcd to have them examined, give men leave 
to r. iect themif theycan; and if there be any thing 
weak and unfound in them, are willing to have it 
detected ; that they themfelves, as well as others, 
may not lay any ftrefs upon any received propoii- 



t)S T R E C X D D C T O F 

ASSOCIATION. 

tion, leyonu what the evidence of its truth will 
warrant and allow. 

There is, I know, a great fault among ail forts 
of people, of principiing their children and fcho- 
lars ; which at laft, when looked into, amounts to 
no more, but making them imbibe their teachers' 
notions and tenets, by an implicit Faith, and firm- 
ly to adhere to them whether true or falle. What 
colours may be given to this, or of what ufe it 
may be when practiied upon the vulgar, deftined 
to labour, and given up to the ferviee of their bel- 
lies, I will not here enquire. But as to the inge- 
nuous part of mankind, whofe condition allows 
them lciiure, and letters, and enquiry after truth ; 
I can lee no other right way of principiing them, 
but to take heed, as much as may be, that in their 
tender years, ideas that have no natural cohefion 
come not to be united in their heads; and that this 
rule be often inculcated to them to be their guide 
in the whole courfe of their lives and (tudics, viz. 
that they never fuffer any ideas to be joined in 
their understandings, in any other or itrcnger 
combination than what their own nature and cor- 
refpondence give them ; and that they often exa- 
mine thole th.it they find linked together in their 
minds, whether this affociation of ideas be fiom 
the vifible agreement that is in the ideas thtm- 
felves, or from the habitual and prevailing cuftom 
of the mind joining them thus together in think- 
ing. 

This is for caution againft this evil, before it 
be thoroughly riveted by cuftom in the under- 
landing ; but he that would cure it when habit 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 97 

FALLACIES. 

has eflablifhed it, muft nicely obferve the very 
quick, and almoft imperceptible motions of the 
mind in its habitual actions. What I have faid in 
another place about the change of ideas of fenfe 
into thofe of judgment, may be proof of this. 
Let any one not {killed in painting, be told when he 
fees bottles and tobacco pipes, and other things fo 
painted, as they are in fome places fhewn, that he 
does not fee protuberances, and you will not con- 
vince him but by the touch : he will not believe 
that by an inftantaneous legerdemain of his own 
thoughts, one idea is fubftituted for the ether. 
How 'frequent inftances may one meet with of 
this in the arguings of the learned, who not fel- 
dom in two ideas that they have been accuftomed 
to join in their minds, fubftitute one for the other; 
and, I am apt to think, often without perceiving 
it themfeives. This, whilft they are under the 
deceit of it, makes them incapable of conviction, 
•and they applaud themfelves as zealous champions 
for truth, when indeed they are contending for 
error. And the confufion of two different ideas 
which a cuftomary connection of them in their 
minds hath made to them almoft one, fills their 
heads with falfe views, and their reafonings with, 
f alfe confequences. 



SECTION XLI. 
FALLACIES. 

Right undemanding confifts in the difcoverr 
and adherence to truth, and that in the perccp- 
K 



93 THfcCON DUCTOF 

1 ALLACIES. 

ticn of the vifible or probable agreement or disa- 
greement of ideas, as they are affirmed and denied 
one of another. From whence it is evident, that 
the right life and conduct of the undei Hand- 
ing, whofe buflneis is purely truth and nothing 
die, is, that the mind fhould be kept in a perfect 
indiiferency, not inclining to either fide, any far- 
ther than evidence Jetties it by knowledge, or the 
overbalance of probability gives it the turn of 
?uTent and belief; but yet it is very hard to meet 
Avith any djfcourie, wherein one may not perceive 
the author not only maintain (for that is reafonable 
•and iit) but inclined and biased to one fide of the 
queftlon, with marks of a deilre that that lhould 
be true. If it be aiked me, how authors who 
have inch a bias and lean to it may be difcoveredi 
I anfwer, by observing how in their writings or 
arguings, they are often led by their inclinations 
to change the ideas of the question, either by- 
changing the terms, or by adding and joining 
Others to them, whereby the ideas under confede- 
ration are fo varied, as to be more ferviceable to 
their purpofe, and to be thereby brought to an 
e tiler and nearer agreement, or more viiible arid 
remoter dlfagreemcnt one with another. This is 
plain and direct ibphiftry ; but I am far from 
thinking, that wherever it is found r is made ufe 
of with defign to deceive and mifiead -the readers. 
It is viiible that men's prejudices and inc ! ons 
by this way impofe often upon themfelves ; and 
their aiilction for truth, under their prepciTciiion 
in favour of one fide, is the very thing that leads 
them from it. Inclination fuggeits and Aides in- 
to their difcourfe favourable terms, which intro- 
duce favourable ideas, till at la ft by this means., 
that is concluded ckfcr. and evident, thus drciVi 



THE UNDERSTANDING. Q s > 

FALLACIES. 

•-. hich taken in its native ftate, by making ufe 
of none but the prtcife determined ideas, would 
find no admittance at all. The putting tbefe 
glories on what they affirm, thefe, as they are 
thought, handforne, taly, and graceful explicati- 
ons or" what they are difcouriing on, is {o much 
the character of what is called and eitecmed writ- 
ing well, that it is very hard to think that authors 
will ever be perfuaded to leave what ferves i'o well 
to propagate their opinions, and procure them- 
fdves credit in the world, for a more jejune and 
dry w;ry of writing, by keening to the lame terms 
precifeiy annexed to the lame ideas, a {'our and 
blunt itiffnefs tolerable in mathematicians only, 
who force their way, and make truth prevail by 
irrcfiitible demonftration. 

But yet if authors cannot be prevailed with to 
quit the loofer, though more infinuating ways of 
writing, if they will not think fit to keep clofe to 
truth and instruction by unvaried terms, and plain 
unfophiiticated arguments, yet it concerns readers* 
nor to beimpofed on by fallacies, and the prevail- 
ing ways of infinuation. To do this, the fureft 
and molt effectual remedy is, to fix in the mind 
the clear ami diftinct ideas of the oueftion ftri| 
of words; and Co likewife in the train of 
mentation, to take up the author's ideas, neglect- 
ing his words, obferving how they connect or fe- 
ite thofe in the queftion. He that does this 
will be able to eaft oft' all that is fuperfluous •, he 
will fee what is pertinent, what coherent, what is 
direct to, what Aides by the queftion. This will 

him all the foreign ideas in the 
eourfe, and where they were brought in ; zud 
lerhaps dazzled the writer, yet bs 

v 



XCO THE CONDUCT 01 

FALLACIES. 

will perceive that they give no light nor ftrength 
to his reafonings. 

This, though it he the fhortefc and eaficftway 
of reading books with profit, and keeping one's 
fclf from being mifled by great names or plaufibis 
difcourfes •, yet it being hard and tedious to thafe 
who have not accufromed tbemfelves to it ; it is 
net to be expected that every one (amongft thole 
few who ready purfue truth) fhould this way 
guard his undei iranding from being impofed on by 
the wilful, or at leaft undefigned fophiftry, which 
creeps into moftof the books of argument. They 
that write againft their conviction, or that next 
to them, are refolved to maintain the tenets of a 
partv they are engaged in, cannot be fuppofed to 
reject any arms that may help to defend their 
caufe, and therefore fuch Ihould be read with the 
greateit caution. And they who write for opini- 
ons they are fincerely perfuaded of, and believe to 
be true, think they may fo far allow themfelves 
to indulge their laudable affection to truth, as to 
permit their efteem of it, to give it the be ft co- 
lour?, and fet it off with the belt expreflions and 
drefs they can, thereby to gain it the eaficft en- 
trance into the minds of their readers, and fix it 
deepeft there. 

One of tbofe being the irate of mind we may 
juftly fuppofe moft writers to be in, it is fit their 
readers, who apply to them for inftruction, fhould 
not lay by that caution which becomes a fincere 
-purfuit of truth, and fhould make them a.. 
watchful againft whatever might conceal or mifrev 
prefent it. If they hayc not the ikill of repre- 
senting to thetafelves / . :;'s icnic by pure 



THE U X D E R S T A N D I :; G. I 1 

T UMDAUENTAL VERITIES. 

Ideas feparated from founds, and thereby diverted 
of the falie lights and deceitful ornaments of 
fpeech ; this yet they ihould do, they fhould 
keep the precife queftion fteadily in their minds, 
carry it along with them through the whole dii- 
courfe, and fufrer not the iealt alteration in the 
terms, either by addition, fubtratftion, or fubfti- 
tuting any other. This every one can do who has 
a mind to it ; and he that has not a mind to it, it 
h plain makes his underttanding only the ware- 
houfe of other men's lumber ; I mean falfe and 
unconcluding reafonings, rather than a repofitory 
o£ truth for his own Life, which will prove fub- 
ftantial, and ftand him ui ftead when he has occa- 
sion for it. And whether fuch an one deals fairly 
by his own mind, and conducts his own under- 
standing right, I leave to his own understanding 
jge. 



SECTION XLU: 



FUNDAMENTAL VERITIES. 

The mind of man being very narrow, and Co 
flow in making acquaintance with things, and 
taking in new truths, that no one man is capable, 
in a much longer life than our's, to know all 
truths j it becomes our prudence in our learch 
after knowledge, to employ our thoughts about 
fundamental and material queftions, carefully 
avoiding thofe that are trifling, and not fuffering 
ourfelvcs to be diverted from our main even pur- 
pose by thofe that are merely incidental. How 
K3 



102 THE CONDUCT OF 

FUNDAMENTAL VERITIES. 

much of many young men's time is thrown away 
in purely logical enquiries, I need not mention. 
This is no better than if a man who was to be a 
painter, fhould fpend all his time in examining 
the threads of the feveral cloths he is to paint up- 
on, and counting the hairs of each p-ncil and 
brufh he intends to ufe in the laying on of his 
colours. Nay, it is much worfc than for a young 
painter to fpend his apprentice (hip in fuch ufelefs 
niceties •, for he at the end of all his pains to no 
purpole, finds that it is not painting, nor any 
help to it, and lb is really to no purpole. Where- 
as men defigned for fcholars have often their heads 
fo filled and warmed with difputes on logical 
queftions, that they take thofe airy ufelefs notions 
for real and fubftantial knowledge, and think their 
understandings fo well furni (htd with fcience, that 
they need not look any farther into the nature of 
things, or defcend to the mechanical drudgery of 
experiment and enquiry. This is fo obvious a mif- 
management of the understanding, and that in 
the profefTed way to knowledge, that it could not 
be parTed by ; to which may be joined abundance 
of queftions, and the way of handling them in 
the fchools. What faults in particular of this 
kind, every mm is, or may be guilty of, would 
be infinite to enumerate \ it fufnees to have fhewn 
that ftjperficial and flight difcoveries and obferva- 
tions that contain nothing of moment in them- 
selves, nor ferve as clues to lead us into farther 
knowledge, fhould be lightly parTed by, and never 
thought worth our Searching after. 

There are fundamental truths that lie at the 
bottom, the bafis upon which a great many others 
reft, and in which they have their coniiftency. 



THE UNDERSTANDING. I03 

BOTTOMING. 

Thefe are teeming truths, rich in ftore, with 
which they furnifh the mind, and, like the lights 
of heaven, are not only beautiful and entertaining 
in themfelves, but give light and evidence to 
other things, that without them could not be fee n 
or known. Such is that admirable difcovery of 
Mr. Newt en , that all bodies gravitate to one an- 
other, which may be counted as the bafis of na- 
tural philofophy *, which of what ufe it is to the 
understanding of the great frame of our folar 
fyitern, he has to the altonimment of the learned 
world fhewn, and how much farther it would 
guide us in other thing?, if rightly purfued is not 
yet known. Our Saviour's great rule, that ive 
joould love our neighbour as ourfelveSy is fuch a fun- 
damental truth for the regulating human fociety ; 
that, I think, by that alone, one might without 
difficulty, determine all the cafts and doubts in 
focial morality. Thefe, and fuch as thefe, are the 
truths we mould endeavour tc find out, and (tore 
our minds with. Which leads me to another 
thing in the conduct of the underftanding that is 
no lefs neceflary, viz. 



SECTION XL 1 1 1. 



BOTTOMING, 



To accuftom curfelves in any queftion propofed 
to examine and find cut upon what it bottoms. 
Molt of the difficulties that come in our way, 
when well confidered and traced, lead us to fome 
proposition, which known to be true, clears the 
doubt, and gives an eafyfolution of the queftion, 
whilft topicai and fuperficial arguments, of which 



1C4> T H E C N D U C T C F 

TRANSFERRING OF THOUGHTS. 

there is ftore to be found on bath lides, filling the 
head with variety of thoughts, and the mouth, 
with copious diicourfe, lerve only to amufe the 
understanding, and entertain company without 
coming to the bottom or the queftion, the only 
place of reft and liability for an inquiitive mind, 
whole tendency is only to truth and knowledge. 

For example, if it be demanded, whether the 
grand feignior can lawfully take what he will from 

any of his people ? This queftion cannot be re— 
fbived without coming to a certainty, whether all 
men are naturally equal •, for upon that it turns, 
and that truth well fettled in the underftanding, 
and carried in the mind through the various de- 
bates concerning the various rights of men in \'o~ 
a great way in putting an end to 
then), and ihewing on which fide the truth is, 



C T I O N XL IV. 



TRANSFERRING OF THOUGHTS. 

There is fcarce any thing more for the improve- 
ment of knowledge, for the ea(e of life, and the 
difpatch of buiinefs, than for a man to be able 
to difpofe of Ids own thoughts ; and there is 
fcarce any thing harder in the whole conduct of 
the underftanding, than to get a full mattery over 
it. The mind, in a waking man, has always fome 
object that it applies itfelf to ; which* when we 
are lazy or unconcerned, we can eaiily change, 
and at pleafure transfer our thoughts to another, 
and from -hence to a third, which, has no rela 



THE UNDERSTANDING. I05 

TRANSFERRING OF THOUGHTS. 

to either of the former. Hence men forwardly 
conclude-, and frequently fay, nothing is fo free 
as thought, and it were well it were fo ; but the 
Contrary will be found true in federal inftances; 

and there are many cafes wherein there is nothing 
mcrereity and ungovernable than our thoughts : 
they will not be directed what objects to purfue, 
nor be taken off from thofe they have once fixed 
on, but run away with a man in purfuit of thofe 
ideas they have in view, let him do what he can. 

I will not here mention again what I have 
above taken notice of, how hard it is to get the 
mind narrowed by a cuftom of thirty or forty 
years (landing to a fcanty collection of obvious 
and common ideas, to enlarge itfelf to a more 
copious itock, and grow into an acquaintance with 
thofe that would afford more abundant matter of 
ufeful contemplation ; it is hot of this I am here 
fpeaking. The inconvenience I would here re- 
present and find a remedy for, is the difficulty 
there is fometimes to transfer our minds from one 
fubject to another, in cafes where the ideas are 
equally familiar to us. 

Matters that are recommended to our thoughts 
by any of our panions, take pofTeilion of cur 
minds with a kind of authority, and will not be 
kept out or diflodged, but as if the paffion that 
rules, were, for the time, the inerirFof the place, 
and came with all the norTe, the understanding is 
feized and taken with the object ii introduces, as 
if it had a legal right to be alone cor. tide red there, 
re it fcarce any body, I think, of fo calm a 
temper v ho hath not lemetime found this f 
ny on his understanding, and fullered undci toe 



706 THE CONDUCT OF 

TRANSFERRING OF THOUGHTS. 

inconvenience of it. Who is there almoft who's 
somd, at fome time or other, love or anger, tear 
or grief, has not fo fafkned to fome clog, that it 
could not turn itfelf to any other object ? I call 
it a clog, for it hangs upon the mind {o as to hin- 
der its vigour and activity in the purfuit of other 
contemplations, and advances itfelf little or not at 
all in the knowledge cf the thing which it fo 
clcfely- hugs and constantly pores on. Men thus 
penciled, are fometimes as if they were fo in the 
word fenfe, and lay under the power of an in- 
chantment. They fee not what pafles before their 
eyes; hear not the audible difcourfe of the com- 
pany ; and when by any ftrong application to 
them they are roufed a little, they are like men 
brought to thcmfllves from fome remote region ; 
whereas in truth they come no farther than their 
fecret cabinet within, where they have been whol- 
ly taken up with the puppet, which is for that 
time appointed for their entertainment. The 
lhame that fuch dumps caufe to well-bred people, 
when it carries them away from the company, 
where they mould bear a part in the conversion, 
is a fufficient argument, that itisa fault in tiie con- 
duce of our understanding, not to have tl 

er it as to make ufe of it to thofe purpoie?, 

on t!\ofe ccc. herein wc have need cf 

its ^.illitance. The mind fhould be always free 

" to turn itfelf to the variety of o : .j;vTt3 

that occur, ai: them as much [ 

as'IhaU for that time be thought fit. To be 

not to be or. 
ive it for another that we judge fitter for our 
contemplation, is to make it of no afe tc 
this ftute of : fo, every 

would, without fcruple, give it the name of per- 



THE UNDERSTANDING. 1 07 

TRANSFERRING OF THOUGHTS. 

■fcdt madnefs; and whilft it does lair, at whatever 
intervals it returns, fuch a rotation of thoughts 
about the iame object no more carries us forwards 
towards the attainment of knowledge, than 
ting upon a mill horfe whilft he jugs on in bis 
circular track wou Id carry a man a journey. 

I grant fomething mufr be allowed to legitimate 
pafiicns, and to natural inclinations. Every man, 
befidcs occalional affections, has beloved ih. 
and thofe the mind will more ciofely frick to ; but 
yet it is belt that it (hould be always at liberty, and 
under the free difppfal of the man, to -.ci how, 
and upon what he directs. This i en- 

deavour to obtain, unlefs we would be content 
with fuch a flaw in our underloadings, that Some- 
times we mould be as it were without it ; for it is 
very little better than fo in cafes where we cannot 
make ufe of it to thofe purposes we would, and 
which ltand in prefent need of it. 

Eut before fit remedies can be thought on for 
this diftafe, we mud know the feveral caufes of 
it, and thereby regulate the cure, if we will hope 
to labour with fucceis. 

One we have already in/lanced in, whereof all 
men that reflect have fo general a knowledge, and 
ih often an experience in themfelves, that no bo- 
dy doubts of it. A prevailing paflion fo pins 
n our thoughts to the object and concern of it, 
t a man p.i(Iionately in love, cannot bring him- 
fclf to think of his ordinary affairs, or a kind 
mother drooping under the lofs of a child, is not 
able to bear a part as (he was wont in the diicourle 
•of the company or cc ?n of her friends. 



I08 THE CONDUCT OF 

TRANSFERRING OF THOUGHTS, 

But though paffion be the mod obvious and 

general, yet it is not the only caufe that binds up 
the underfunding, and confines it for the time to 
one object, from which it will not be taken oil. 

Bdides this, we may often find that the under- 
ftanding when it has a while employed itfelf uoon. 
a fubject which either chance, or fome flight ac- 
cident, offered to it w : thcut the interest or recom- 
mendation of any panion, works itfelf into a 
warmth, and by degrees gets into a career, where- 
in, like a bowl down a hill, it increafes its moti- 
on by going, and will not be flopped or diverted, 
though, when the heat is over, it fees all this 
earned application was about a trifle not worth a 
thought, and all the pains employed about it, loll 
labour. 

There is a third fort, if I raiftake not, yet lower 
than this ; it is a fort of childimncfs, if I may fo 
f,;y, of the underftanling, wherein, during the 
fit, it pb.ys with, and dandles feme iniignincant 
puppet to no end, nor with any defign at all, and 
yet cannot eaniy be got off from it. Thus fome 
trivial fentence, or a fcrap of poetry will fome- 
times get into men's heads, and make fuch a 
chiming there, that there is no (tilling of it, no 
peace to be obtained, nor attention to any thing 
elfe; but this impertinent gueft will take up the 
mind and poflefs the thoughts in fpite of all en- 
deavours to get rid of it. Whether every one 
hath experimented inthcmfelves this troublefome 
intiunon of fome frifking ideas which thus im- 
portune the understanding, and hinder it from 
being better employed, I know not. But perfons 
of very good parts, and thofe more than one, I 



THE UNDERSTANDING. I09 

TRANSFERRING OF THOUGHTS. 

have heard fpeak and complain of it themfelves. 
The reafon I have to make this doubt, is from 
what I have known in a cafe fomething of kin to 
this, though much odder, and that is of a ibrt 
of vifions that iome people have, lying quiet but 
perfectly awake in the dark, or with their eyes 
ihut. It is a great variety of faces, moft com- 
monly very odd ones, that appear to them in a 
train one after another •, fo that having had juft 
the fight of the one, it immediately pafTcs away 
to give place to another, that the lame inftant 
i'ueceeds, and has as quick an exit as its leader, 
and ib they march on in a conftant fuccemon ; 
nor can any one of them by any endeavour be 
ftopped or retained beyond the inftant of its ap- 
pearance, but is thruft out by its follower, which 
will have its turn. Concerning this fantaftical 
phenomenon, I have talked with feveral people, 
whereof fome have been perfectly acquainted with 
it, and others have been fo wholly ftrangers to it, 
that they could hardly be brought to conceive or 
believe it. I knew a lady of excellent parts, who 
had got pair thirty without having ever had the 
leaft notice of any luch thing ; ihe was fo great a 
(tranger to it, that when fhe heard me and an- 
other talking of it, could fcarce forbear thinking 
we bantered her ; but fome time after drinking a 
large dofe of dilute tea (as ihe was ordered by a 
phyfician) going .to bed, (he told us at next meet- 
ing, that ihe had now experimented what our dif- 
courfe had much ado to perfuade her of. She had 
feen a great variety of faces in a long train, iuc- 
ceeding one another, as we had defcribed, they 
were all ftrangers and intruders, fuch as flie had 
no acquaintance with before, nor fought after 
then, and as^they came of themfelves they went 

JL1 



110 THE CONDUCT Of 

TRANSFERRING OF THOUGHTS. 

too; none of them flayed a moment, nor coulc 
be detained by all the endeavours (he could life, 
but went on in their foleinn procefiion, juft appear- 
ed and then vanilhed. This odd phenomenon 
feems to have a mechanical caufe, and to depend 
upon the matter and motion of the biood or ani- 
mal fpirits. 

When the fancy is bound by pamon, I know- 
no way to let the mind free and at liberty to pro-- 
fecute what thoughts the man would make choice 
of but to allay the prefect paiiion, or counter- 
balance it with another, which is an art to be got. 
by ftudy, and acquaintance with the paiiions. 

Thofe who find themfelves apt to be earned 
away with the fpontaneous current of their own 
thoughts, not excited by any pifnon or intereft, 
mutt be very wary and careful in all the inftances 
of it to flop it, and never humour their minds in 
being thus triflingly buiy. Men know the value 
of their corporal liberty, and therefore fuffer not 
willingly fetters and chains to be put upon them. . 
To have the mind captivated, is, for the time, 
certainly the greater evil of the two, and defcrves 
our utmoft care and endeavours to preferve the 
freedom of our better part. In this cafe our pains 
will not be loft-, driving and ft niggling will pre- 
vail, if we conftantly, in ail fuch oecafions, make 
ufe of it. We muft never indulge thefe trivial 
attentions of thought ; as foon as we rind the 
mind makes itfelf a bufinefs of nothing, we ihould > 
immediately difturb and check it, introduce new 
and more ferious conuderations, and not leave till 
we have beaten it off* from the purfuit if was up-- 
©n. This, at fir ft, if we have let the contrary. 



T H E UNMJLRo T A N D 1 N G . 
TRANSFERRING 01 THOUGHTS. 

::ce grow to an habit, will perhaps be difficult; 
but conltant endeavours will by degrees prevail^ 
and at laft make it eafy. And when a man is- 
pretty well advanced, and can command his mind 
off at pleafure from incidental and undesigned 
purfuits, it may not be amifs for him to go on 
farther, and make attempts upon meditations of 
greater moment, that at the laft he may have a 
full power over his own mind, and be fo fully 
matter of his own thoughts, as to be able to 
transfer them from one fubject to another, with 
the fame eafe that he can lay by any thing he has 
in hand, and take fomething elie that he lias a 
mind to in the room of it. This liberty of mind 
is of great ufe bcth in bufinefs and ftudy, and he 
that has got it will have no fmall advantage of 
eafe and difpatch in all that is the chofen and 
ufeful employment of his underftanding. 

The third and laft way which I mentioned the mind 
to befometimes taken up with, I mean the chiming 
offomeparticularwordsorfentencein thememory, 
and, as it were, making a noile in the head, and 
the like, feldom happens but when the mind is 
lazy or very looiely and negligently employed. Jt 
were better indeed be without fuch impertinent 
and ufelefs repetitions. . Any obvious idea when 
it is roving caufelefsiy at a venture, being of more 
ufe and apter to fuggeft fomething worth confi- 
deration, than the infignificant buz of purely 
empty founds. Butfmce the routing of the mind, 
and letting the underftanding on work with fame 
degrees of vigor, does for the molt part prefently 
fet it free from thefe idle companions ; it may not 
be amifs whenever we find ourfeives troubled with 
them, to make ufe of io profitable a remedy that 
is always at hand. 

E I N I S 



tt*Jb 






